(debug-on-entry FUNCTION)
Request FUNCTION to invoke debugger each time it is called.

When called interactively, prompt for FUNCTION in the minibuffer.

This works by modifying the definition of FUNCTION.  If you tell the
debugger to continue, FUNCTION's execution proceeds.  If FUNCTION is a
normal function or a macro written in Lisp, you can also step through
its execution.  FUNCTION can also be a primitive that is not a special
form, in which case stepping is not possible.  Break-on-entry for
primitive functions only works when that function is called from Lisp.

Use \[cancel-debug-on-entry] to cancel the effect of this command.
Redefining FUNCTION also cancels it.

15254-----(cancel-debug-on-entry &optional FUNCTION)
Undo effect of \[debug-on-entry] on FUNCTION.
If FUNCTION is nil, cancel debug-on-entry for all functions.
When called interactively, prompt for FUNCTION in the minibuffer.
To specify a nil argument interactively, exit with an empty minibuffer.

15254-----(beginning-of-line &optional N)
Move point to beginning of current line (in the logical order).
With argument N not nil or 1, move forward N - 1 lines first.
If point reaches the beginning or end of buffer, it stops there.

This function constrains point to the current field unless this moves
point to a different line than the original, unconstrained result.
If N is nil or 1, and a front-sticky field starts at point, the point
does not move.  To ignore field boundaries bind
`inhibit-field-text-motion' to t, or use the `forward-line' function
instead.  For instance, `(forward-line 0)' does the same thing as
`(beginning-of-line)', except that it ignores field boundaries.

15254-----(end-of-line &optional N)
Move point to end of current line (in the logical order).
With argument N not nil or 1, move forward N - 1 lines first.
If point reaches the beginning or end of buffer, it stops there.
To ignore intangibility, bind `inhibit-point-motion-hooks' to t.

This function constrains point to the current field unless this moves
point to a different line than the original, unconstrained result.  If
N is nil or 1, and a rear-sticky field ends at point, the point does
not move.  To ignore field boundaries bind `inhibit-field-text-motion'
to t.

15254-----(forward-line &optional N)
Move N lines forward (backward if N is negative).
Precisely, if point is on line I, move to the start of line I + N
("start of line" in the logical order).
If there isn't room, go as far as possible (no error).

Returns the count of lines left to move.  If moving forward,
that is N minus number of lines moved; if backward, N plus number
moved.

Exception: With positive N, a non-empty line at the end of the
buffer, or of its accessible portion, counts as one line
successfully moved (for the return value).  This means that the
function will move point to the end of such a line and will count
it as a line moved across, even though there is no next line to
go to its beginning.

15254-----(count-words START END)
Count words between START and END.
If called interactively, START and END are normally the start and
end of the buffer; but if the region is active, START and END are
the start and end of the region.  Print a message reporting the
number of lines, words, and chars.

If called from Lisp, return the number of words between START and
END, without printing any message.

15254-----(switch-to-buffer BUFFER-OR-NAME &optional NORECORD FORCE-SAME-WINDOW)
Display buffer BUFFER-OR-NAME in the selected window.

WARNING: This is NOT the way to work on another buffer temporarily
within a Lisp program!  Use `set-buffer' instead.  That avoids
messing with the window-buffer correspondences.

If the selected window cannot display the specified buffer
because it is a minibuffer window or strongly dedicated to
another buffer, call `pop-to-buffer' to select the buffer in
another window.  In interactive use, if the selected window is
strongly dedicated to its buffer, the value of the option
`switch-to-buffer-in-dedicated-window' specifies how to proceed.

If called interactively, read the buffer name using `read-buffer'.
The variable `confirm-nonexistent-file-or-buffer' determines
whether to request confirmation before creating a new buffer.
See `read-buffer' for features related to input and completion
of buffer names.

BUFFER-OR-NAME may be a buffer, a string (a buffer name), or nil.
If BUFFER-OR-NAME is a string that does not identify an existing
buffer, create a buffer with that name.  If BUFFER-OR-NAME is
nil, switch to the buffer returned by `other-buffer'.

If optional argument NORECORD is non-nil, do not put the buffer
at the front of the buffer list, and do not make the window
displaying it the most recently selected one.

If optional argument FORCE-SAME-WINDOW is non-nil, the buffer
must be displayed in the selected window when called
non-interactively; if that is impossible, signal an error rather
than calling `pop-to-buffer'.

The option `switch-to-buffer-preserve-window-point' can be used
to make the buffer appear at its last position in the selected
window.

Return the buffer switched to.

15254-----(switch-to-buffer-other-window BUFFER-OR-NAME &optional NORECORD)
Select the buffer specified by BUFFER-OR-NAME in another window.
BUFFER-OR-NAME may be a buffer, a string (a buffer name), or
nil.  Return the buffer switched to.

If called interactively, read the buffer name using `read-buffer'.
The variable `confirm-nonexistent-file-or-buffer' determines
whether to request confirmation before creating a new buffer.
See `read-buffer' for features related to input and completion
of buffer names.

If BUFFER-OR-NAME is a string and does not identify an existing
buffer, create a new buffer with that name.  If BUFFER-OR-NAME is
nil, switch to the buffer returned by `other-buffer'.

Optional second argument NORECORD non-nil means do not put this
buffer at the front of the list of recently selected ones.

This uses the function `display-buffer' as a subroutine; see its
documentation for additional customization information.

15254-----(switch-to-buffer-other-frame BUFFER-OR-NAME &optional NORECORD)
Switch to buffer BUFFER-OR-NAME in another frame.
BUFFER-OR-NAME may be a buffer, a string (a buffer name), or
nil.  Return the buffer switched to.

If called interactively, read the buffer name using `read-buffer'.
The variable `confirm-nonexistent-file-or-buffer' determines
whether to request confirmation before creating a new buffer.
See `read-buffer' for features related to input and completion
of buffer names.

If BUFFER-OR-NAME is a string and does not identify an existing
buffer, create a new buffer with that name.  If BUFFER-OR-NAME is
nil, switch to the buffer returned by `other-buffer'.

Optional second arg NORECORD non-nil means do not put this
buffer at the front of the list of recently selected ones.

This uses the function `display-buffer' as a subroutine; see its
documentation for additional customization information.

15254-----(pop-to-buffer BUFFER-OR-NAME &optional ACTION NORECORD)
Display buffer specified by BUFFER-OR-NAME and select its window.
BUFFER-OR-NAME may be a buffer, a string (a buffer name), or nil.
If it is a string not naming an existent buffer, create a buffer
with that name.  If BUFFER-OR-NAME is nil, choose some other
buffer.  In either case, make that buffer current and return it.

This uses `display-buffer' as a subroutine.  The optional ACTION
argument is passed to `display-buffer' as its ACTION argument.
See `display-buffer' for more information.  ACTION is t if called
interactively with a prefix argument, which means to pop to a
window other than the selected one even if the buffer is already
displayed in the selected window.

If a suitable window is found, select that window.  If it is not
on the selected frame, raise that window's frame and give it
input focus.

Optional third arg NORECORD non-nil means do not put this buffer
at the front of the list of recently selected ones.

15254-----(indent-relative &optional FIRST-ONLY UNINDENTED-OK)
Space out to under next indent point in previous nonblank line.
An indent point is a non-whitespace character following whitespace.
The following line shows the indentation points in this line.
    ^         ^    ^     ^   ^           ^      ^  ^    ^
If FIRST-ONLY is non-nil, then only the first indent point is
considered.

If the previous nonblank line has no indent points beyond the
column point starts at, then `tab-to-tab-stop' is done, if both
FIRST-ONLY and UNINDENTED-OK are nil, otherwise nothing is done
in this case.

See also `indent-relative-first-indent-point'.

15254-----indent-relative-maybe
Indent the current line like the previous nonblank line.
Indent to the first indentation position in the previous nonblank
line if that position is greater than the current column.

See also `indent-relative'.(run-at-time TIME REPEAT FUNCTION &rest ARGS)
Perform an action at time TIME.
Repeat the action every REPEAT seconds, if REPEAT is non-nil.
REPEAT may be an integer or floating point number.
TIME should be one of:
- a string giving today's time like "11:23pm"
  (the acceptable formats are HHMM, H:MM, HH:MM, HHam, HHAM,
  HHpm, HHPM, HH:MMam, HH:MMAM, HH:MMpm, or HH:MMPM;
  a period `.' can be used instead of a colon `:' to separate
  the hour and minute parts);
- a string giving a relative time like "90" or "2 hours 35 minutes"
  (the acceptable forms are a number of seconds without units
  or some combination of values using units in `timer-duration-words');
- nil, meaning now;
- a number of seconds from now;
- a value from `encode-time';
- or t (with non-nil REPEAT) meaning the next integral
  multiple of REPEAT.

The action is to call FUNCTION with arguments ARGS.

This function returns a timer object which you can use in
`cancel-timer'.

15254-----(write-abbrev-file &optional FILE VERBOSE)
Write all user-level abbrev definitions to a file of Lisp code.
This does not include system abbrevs; it includes only the abbrev tables
listed in listed in `abbrev-table-name-list'.
The file written can be loaded in another session to define the same abbrevs.
The argument FILE is the file name to write.  If omitted or nil, the file
specified in `abbrev-file-name' is used.
If VERBOSE is non-nil, display a message indicating where abbrevs
have been saved.

15254-----(indent-for-tab-command &optional ARG)
Indent the current line or region, or insert a tab, as appropriate.
This function either inserts a tab, or indents the current line,
or performs symbol completion, depending on `tab-always-indent'.
The function called to actually indent the line or insert a tab
is given by the variable `indent-line-function'.

If a prefix argument is given, after this function indents the
current line or inserts a tab, it also rigidly indents the entire
balanced expression which starts at the beginning of the current
line, to reflect the current line's indentation.

In most major modes, if point was in the current line's
indentation, it is moved to the first non-whitespace character
after indenting; otherwise it stays at the same position relative
to the text.

If `transient-mark-mode' is turned on and the region is active,
this function instead calls `indent-region'.  In this case, any
prefix argument is ignored.

15254-----indent-according-to-mode
Indent line in proper way for current major mode.
Normally, this is done by calling the function specified by the
variable `indent-line-function'.  However, if the value of that
variable is `indent-relative' or `indent-relative-maybe', handle
it specially (since those functions are used for tabbing); in
that case, indent by aligning to the previous non-blank line.newline-and-indent
Insert a newline, then indent according to major mode.
Indentation is done using the value of `indent-line-function'.
In programming language modes, this is the same as TAB.
In some text modes, where TAB inserts a tab, this command indents to the
column specified by the function `current-left-margin'.reindent-then-newline-and-indent
Reindent current line, insert newline, then indent the new line.
Indentation of both lines is done according to the current major mode,
which means calling the current value of `indent-line-function'.
In programming language modes, this is the same as TAB.
In some text modes, where TAB inserts a tab, this indents to the
column specified by the function `current-left-margin'.minibuffer-complete-word
Complete the minibuffer contents at most a single word.
After one word is completed as much as possible, a space or hyphen
is added, provided that matches some possible completion.
Return nil if there is no valid completion, else t.minibuffer-complete
Complete the minibuffer contents as far as possible.
Return nil if there is no valid completion, else t.
If no characters can be completed, display a list of possible completions.
If you repeat this command after it displayed such a list,
scroll the window of possible completions.minibuffer-complete-and-exit
Exit if the minibuffer contains a valid completion.
Otherwise, try to complete the minibuffer contents.  If
completion leads to a valid completion, a repetition of this
command will exit.

If `minibuffer-completion-confirm' is `confirm', do not try to
 complete; instead, ask for confirmation and accept any input if
 confirmed.
If `minibuffer-completion-confirm' is `confirm-after-completion',
 do not try to complete; instead, ask for confirmation if the
 preceding minibuffer command was a member of
 `minibuffer-confirm-exit-commands', and accept the input
 otherwise.(minibuffer-completion-help &optional START END)
Display a list of possible completions of the current minibuffer contents.

15254-----fill-paragraph
Fill paragraph at or after point.

If JUSTIFY is non-nil (interactively, with prefix argument), justify as well.
If `sentence-end-double-space' is non-nil, then period followed by one
space does not end a sentence, so don't break a line there.
The variable `fill-column' controls the width for filling.

If `fill-paragraph-function' is non-nil, we call it (passing our
argument to it), and if it returns non-nil, we simply return its value.

If `fill-paragraph-function' is nil, return the `fill-prefix' used for filling.

The REGION argument is non-nil if called interactively; in that
case, if Transient Mark mode is enabled and the mark is active,
call `fill-region' to fill each of the paragraphs in the active
region, instead of just filling the current paragraph.fill-region
Fill each of the paragraphs in the region.
A prefix arg means justify as well.
The `fill-column' variable controls the width.

Noninteractively, the third argument JUSTIFY specifies which
kind of justification to do: `full', `left', `right', `center',
or `none' (equivalent to nil).  A value of t means handle each
paragraph as specified by its text properties.

The fourth arg NOSQUEEZE non-nil means to leave whitespace other
than line breaks untouched, and fifth arg TO-EOP non-nil means
to keep filling to the end of the paragraph (or next hard newline,
if variable `use-hard-newlines' is on).

Return the fill-prefix used for filling the last paragraph.

If `sentence-end-double-space' is non-nil, then period followed by one
space does not end a sentence, so don't break a line there.fill-individual-paragraphs
Fill paragraphs of uniform indentation within the region.
This command divides the region into "paragraphs",
treating every change in indentation level or prefix as a paragraph boundary,
then fills each paragraph using its indentation level as the fill prefix.

There is one special case where a change in indentation does not start
a new paragraph.  This is for text of this form:

   foo>    This line with extra indentation starts
   foo> a paragraph that continues on more lines.

These lines are filled together.

When calling from a program, pass the range to fill
as the first two arguments.

Optional third and fourth arguments JUSTIFY and CITATION-REGEXP:
JUSTIFY to justify paragraphs (prefix arg).
When filling a mail message, pass a regexp for CITATION-REGEXP
which will match the prefix of a line which is a citation marker
plus whitespace, but no other kind of prefix.
Also, if CITATION-REGEXP is non-nil, don't fill header lines.fill-region-as-paragraph
Fill the region as one paragraph.
It removes any paragraph breaks in the region and extra newlines at the end,
indents and fills lines between the margins given by the
`current-left-margin' and `current-fill-column' functions.
(In most cases, the variable `fill-column' controls the width.)
It leaves point at the beginning of the line following the paragraph.

Normally performs justification according to the `current-justification'
function, but with a prefix arg, does full justification instead.

From a program, optional third arg JUSTIFY can specify any type of
justification.  Fourth arg NOSQUEEZE non-nil means not to make spaces
between words canonical before filling.  Fifth arg SQUEEZE-AFTER, if non-nil,
means don't canonicalize spaces before that position.

Return the `fill-prefix' used for filling.

If `sentence-end-double-space' is non-nil, then period followed by one
space does not end a sentence, so don't break a line there.justify-current-line
Do some kind of justification on this line.
Normally does full justification: adds spaces to the line to make it end at
the column given by `current-fill-column'.
Optional first argument HOW specifies alternate type of justification:
it can be `left', `right', `full', `center', or `none'.
If HOW is t, will justify however the `current-justification' function says to.
If HOW is nil or missing, full justification is done by default.
Second arg EOP non-nil means that this is the last line of the paragraph, so
it will not be stretched by full justification.
Third arg NOSQUEEZE non-nil means to leave interior whitespace unchanged,
otherwise it is made canonical.push-button
Perform the action specified by a button at location POS.
POS may be either a buffer position or a mouse-event.  If
USE-MOUSE-ACTION is non-nil, invoke the button's `mouse-action'
property instead of its `action' property; if the button has no
`mouse-action', the value of `action' is used instead.

The action in both cases may be either a function to call or a
marker to display and is invoked using `button-activate' (which
see).

POS defaults to point, except when `push-button' is invoked
interactively as the result of a mouse-event, in which case, the
mouse event is used.
If there's no button at POS, do nothing and return nil, otherwise
return t.forward-button
Move to the Nth next button, or Nth previous button if N is negative.
If N is 0, move to the start of any button at point.
If WRAP is non-nil, moving past either end of the buffer continues from the
other end.
If DISPLAY-MESSAGE is non-nil, the button's help-echo string is displayed.
Any button with a non-nil `skip' property is skipped over.
Returns the button found.backward-button
Move to the Nth previous button, or Nth next button if N is negative.
If N is 0, move to the start of any button at point.
If WRAP is non-nil, moving past either end of the buffer continues from the
other end.
If DISPLAY-MESSAGE is non-nil, the button's help-echo string is displayed.
Any button with a non-nil `skip' property is skipped over.
Returns the button found.(append-to-file START END FILENAME)
Append the contents of the region to the end of file FILENAME.
When called from a function, expects three arguments,
START, END and FILENAME.  START and END are normally buffer positions
specifying the part of the buffer to write.
If START is nil, that means to use the entire buffer contents.
If START is a string, then output that string to the file
instead of any buffer contents; END is ignored.

This does character code conversion and applies annotations
like `write-region' does.

15254-----(write-region START END FILENAME &optional APPEND VISIT LOCKNAME MUSTBENEW)
Write current region into specified file.
When called from a program, requires three arguments:
START, END and FILENAME.  START and END are normally buffer positions
specifying the part of the buffer to write.
If START is nil, that means to use the entire buffer contents; END is
ignored.
If START is a string, then output that string to the file
instead of any buffer contents; END is ignored.

Optional fourth argument APPEND if non-nil means
  append to existing file contents (if any).  If it is a number,
  seek to that offset in the file before writing.
Optional fifth argument VISIT, if t or a string, means
  set the last-save-file-modtime of buffer to this file's modtime
  and mark buffer not modified.
If VISIT is a string, it is a second file name;
  the output goes to FILENAME, but the buffer is marked as visiting VISIT.
  VISIT is also the file name to lock and unlock for clash detection.
If VISIT is neither t nor nil nor a string, or if Emacs is in batch mode,
  do not display the "Wrote file" message.
The optional sixth arg LOCKNAME, if non-nil, specifies the name to
  use for locking and unlocking, overriding FILENAME and VISIT.
The optional seventh arg MUSTBENEW, if non-nil, insists on a check
  for an existing file with the same name.  If MUSTBENEW is `excl',
  that means to get an error if the file already exists; never overwrite.
  If MUSTBENEW is neither nil nor `excl', that means ask for
  confirmation before overwriting, but do go ahead and overwrite the file
  if the user confirms.

This does code conversion according to the value of
`coding-system-for-write', `buffer-file-coding-system', or
`file-coding-system-alist', and sets the variable
`last-coding-system-used' to the coding system actually used.

This calls `write-region-annotate-functions' at the start, and
`write-region-post-annotation-function' at the end.

15254-----universal-argument
Begin a numeric argument for the following command.
Digits or minus sign following \[universal-argument] make up the numeric argument.
\[universal-argument] following the digits or minus sign ends the argument.
\[universal-argument] without digits or minus sign provides 4 as argument.
Repeating \[universal-argument] without digits or minus sign
 multiplies the argument by 4 each time.
For some commands, just \[universal-argument] by itself serves as a flag
which is different in effect from any particular numeric argument.
These commands include \[set-mark-command] and \[start-kbd-macro].(digit-argument ARG)
Part of the numeric argument for the next command.
\[universal-argument] following digits or minus sign ends the argument.

15254-----(negative-argument ARG)
Begin a negative numeric argument for the next command.
\[universal-argument] following digits or minus sign ends the argument.

15254-----(suspend-emacs &optional STUFFSTRING)
Stop Emacs and return to superior process.  You can resume later.
If `cannot-suspend' is non-nil, or if the system doesn't support job
control, run a subshell instead.

If optional arg STUFFSTRING is non-nil, its characters are stuffed
to be read as terminal input by Emacs's parent, after suspension.

Before suspending, run the normal hook `suspend-hook'.
After resumption run the normal hook `suspend-resume-hook'.

Some operating systems cannot stop the Emacs process and resume it later.
On such systems, Emacs starts a subshell instead of suspending.

15254-----suspend-frame
Do whatever is right to suspend the current frame.
Calls `suspend-emacs' if invoked from the controlling tty device,
`suspend-tty' from a secondary tty device, and
`iconify-or-deiconify-frame' from an X frame.(set-input-method INPUT-METHOD &optional INTERACTIVE)
Select and activate input method INPUT-METHOD for the current buffer.
This also sets the default input method to the one you specify.
If INPUT-METHOD is nil, this function turns off the input method, and
also causes you to be prompted for a name of an input method the next
time you invoke \[toggle-input-method].
When called interactively, the optional arg INTERACTIVE is non-nil,
which marks the variable `default-input-method' as set for Custom buffers.

To deactivate the input method interactively, use \[toggle-input-method].
To deactivate it programmatically, use `deactivate-input-method'.

15254-----(indent-to COLUMN &optional MINIMUM)
Indent from point with tabs and spaces until COLUMN is reached.
Optional second argument MINIMUM says always do at least MINIMUM spaces
even if that goes past COLUMN; by default, MINIMUM is zero.

The return value is the column where the insertion ends.

15254-----describe-current-display-table
Describe the display table in use in the selected window and buffer.(read-color &optional PROMPT CONVERT-TO-RGB ALLOW-EMPTY-NAME MSG)
Read a color name or RGB triplet.
Completion is available for color names, but not for RGB triplets.

RGB triplets have the form "#RRGGBB".  Each of the R, G, and B
components can have one to four digits, but all three components
must have the same number of digits.  Each digit is a hex value
between 0 and F; either upper case or lower case for A through F
are acceptable.

In addition to standard color names and RGB hex values, the
following are available as color candidates.  In each case, the
corresponding color is used.

 * `foreground at point'   - foreground under the cursor
 * `background at point'   - background under the cursor

Optional arg PROMPT is the prompt; if nil, use a default prompt.

Interactively, or with optional arg CONVERT-TO-RGB-P non-nil,
convert an input color name to an RGB hex string.  Return the RGB
hex string.

If optional arg ALLOW-EMPTY-NAME is non-nil, the user is allowed
to enter an empty color name (the empty string).

Interactively, or with optional arg MSG non-nil, print the
resulting color name in the echo area.

15254-----(posix-search-forward REGEXP &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search forward from point for regular expression REGEXP.
Find the longest match in accord with Posix regular expression rules.
Set point to the end of the occurrence found, and return point.
An optional second argument bounds the search; it is a buffer position.
  The match found must not end after that position.  A value of nil
  means search to the end of the accessible portion of the buffer.
Optional third argument, if t, means if fail just return nil (no error).
  If not nil and not t, move to limit of search and return nil.
Optional fourth argument COUNT, if a positive number, means to search
  for COUNT successive occurrences.  If COUNT is negative, search
  backward, instead of forward, for -COUNT occurrences.  A value of
  nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive, the match found is the COUNTth one (or first,
  if COUNT is 1 or nil) in the buffer located entirely after the
  origin of the search; correspondingly with COUNT negative.

Search case-sensitivity is determined by the value of the variable
`case-fold-search', which see.

See also the functions `match-beginning', `match-end', `match-string',
and `replace-match'.

15254-----(posix-search-backward REGEXP &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search backward from point for match for regular expression REGEXP.
Find the longest match in accord with Posix regular expression rules.
Set point to the beginning of the occurrence found, and return point.
An optional second argument bounds the search; it is a buffer position.
  The match found must not begin before that position.  A value of nil
  means search to the beginning of the accessible portion of the buffer.
Optional third argument, if t, means if fail just return nil (no error).
  If not nil and not t, position at limit of search and return nil.
Optional fourth argument COUNT, if a positive number, means to search
  for COUNT successive occurrences.  If COUNT is negative, search
  forward, instead of backward, for -COUNT occurrences.  A value of
  nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive, the match found is the COUNTth to last one (or
  last, if COUNT is 1 or nil) in the buffer located entirely before
  the origin of the search; correspondingly with COUNT negative.

Search case-sensitivity is determined by the value of the variable
`case-fold-search', which see.

See also the functions `match-beginning', `match-end', `match-string',
and `replace-match'.

15254-----(save-buffer &optional ARG)
Save current buffer in visited file if modified.
Variations are described below.

By default, makes the previous version into a backup file
 if previously requested or if this is the first save.
Prefixed with one \[universal-argument], marks this version
 to become a backup when the next save is done.
Prefixed with two \[universal-argument]'s,
 makes the previous version into a backup file.
Prefixed with three \[universal-argument]'s, marks this version
 to become a backup when the next save is done,
 and makes the previous version into a backup file.

With a numeric prefix argument of 0, never make the previous version
into a backup file.

Note that the various variables that control backups, such
as `version-control', `backup-enable-predicate', `vc-make-backup-files',
and `backup-inhibited', to name just the more popular ones, still
control whether a backup will actually be produced, even when you
invoke this command prefixed with two or three \[universal-argument]'s.

If a file's name is FOO, the names of its numbered backup versions are
 FOO.~i~ for various integers i.  A non-numbered backup file is called FOO~.
Numeric backups (rather than FOO~) will be made if value of
 `version-control' is not the atom `never' and either there are already
 numeric versions of the file being backed up, or `version-control' is
 non-nil.
We don't want excessive versions piling up, so there are variables
 `kept-old-versions', which tells Emacs how many oldest versions to keep,
 and `kept-new-versions', which tells how many newest versions to keep.
 Defaults are 2 old versions and 2 new.
`dired-kept-versions' controls dired's clean-directory (.) command.
If `delete-old-versions' is nil, system will query user
 before trimming versions.  Otherwise it does it silently.

If `vc-make-backup-files' is nil, which is the default,
 no backup files are made for files managed by version control.
 (This is because the version control system itself records previous versions.)

See the subroutine `basic-save-buffer' for more information.

15254-----(save-some-buffers &optional ARG PRED)
Save some modified file-visiting buffers.  Asks user about each one.
You can answer `y' to save, `n' not to save, `C-r' to look at the
buffer in question with `view-buffer' before deciding or `d' to
view the differences using `diff-buffer-with-file'.

This command first saves any buffers where `buffer-save-without-query' is
non-nil, without asking.

Optional argument ARG (interactively, prefix argument) non-nil means save
all with no questions.
Optional second argument PRED determines which buffers are considered:
If PRED is nil, all the file-visiting buffers are considered.
If PRED is t, then certain non-file buffers will also be considered.
If PRED is a zero-argument function, it indicates for each buffer whether
to consider it or not when called with that buffer current.
PRED defaults to the value of `save-some-buffers-default-predicate'.

See `save-some-buffers-action-alist' if you want to
change the additional actions you can take on files.

15254-----(write-file FILENAME &optional CONFIRM)
Write current buffer into file FILENAME.
This makes the buffer visit that file, and marks it as not modified.

If you specify just a directory name as FILENAME, that means to use
the default file name but in that directory.  You can also yank
the default file name into the minibuffer to edit it, using \<minibuffer-local-map>\[next-history-element].

If the buffer is not already visiting a file, the default file name
for the output file is the buffer name.

If optional second arg CONFIRM is non-nil, this function
asks for confirmation before overwriting an existing file.
Interactively, confirmation is required unless you supply a prefix argument.

15254-----(signal-process PROCESS SIGCODE)
Send PROCESS the signal with code SIGCODE.
PROCESS may also be a number specifying the process id of the
process to signal; in this case, the process need not be a child of
this Emacs.
SIGCODE may be an integer, or a symbol whose name is a signal name.

15254-----exit-minibuffer
Terminate this minibuffer argument.self-insert-and-exit
Terminate minibuffer input.(previous-history-element N)
Puts previous element of the minibuffer history in the minibuffer.
With argument N, it uses the Nth previous element.

15254-----(next-history-element N)
Puts next element of the minibuffer history in the minibuffer.
With argument N, it uses the Nth following element.

15254-----(previous-matching-history-element REGEXP N)
Find the previous history element that matches REGEXP.
(Previous history elements refer to earlier actions.)
With prefix argument N, search for Nth previous match.
If N is negative, find the next or Nth next match.
Normally, history elements are matched case-insensitively if
`case-fold-search' is non-nil, but an uppercase letter in REGEXP
makes the search case-sensitive.
See also `minibuffer-history-case-insensitive-variables'.

15254-----(next-matching-history-element REGEXP N)
Find the next history element that matches REGEXP.
(The next history element refers to a more recent action.)
With prefix argument N, search for Nth next match.
If N is negative, find the previous or Nth previous match.
Normally, history elements are matched case-insensitively if
`case-fold-search' is non-nil, but an uppercase letter in REGEXP
makes the search case-sensitive.

15254-----(previous-complete-history-element N)
Get previous history element which completes the minibuffer before the point.
The contents of the minibuffer after the point are deleted, and replaced
by the new completion.

15254-----(next-complete-history-element N)
Get next history element which completes the minibuffer before the point.
The contents of the minibuffer after the point are deleted, and replaced
by the new completion.

15254-----(load-file FILE)
Load the Lisp file named FILE.

15254-----(load-library LIBRARY)
Load the Emacs Lisp library named LIBRARY.
LIBRARY should be a string.
This is an interface to the function `load'.  LIBRARY is searched
for in `load-path', both with and without `load-suffixes' (as
well as `load-file-rep-suffixes').

See Info node `(emacs)Lisp Libraries' for more details.
See `load-file' for a different interface to `load'.

15254-----(read-only-mode &optional ARG)
Change whether the current buffer is read-only.
With prefix argument ARG, make the buffer read-only if ARG is
positive, otherwise make it writable.  If buffer is read-only
and `view-read-only' is non-nil, enter view mode.

Do not call this from a Lisp program unless you really intend to
do the same thing as the \[read-only-mode] command, including
possibly enabling or disabling View mode.  Also, note that this
command works by setting the variable `buffer-read-only', which
does not affect read-only regions caused by text properties.  To
ignore read-only status in a Lisp program (whether due to text
properties or buffer state), bind `inhibit-read-only' temporarily
to a non-nil value.

15254-----(kill-emacs &optional ARG)
Exit the Emacs job and kill it.
If ARG is an integer, return ARG as the exit program code.
If ARG is a string, stuff it as keyboard input.

This function is called upon receipt of the signals SIGTERM
or SIGHUP, and upon SIGINT in batch mode.

The value of `kill-emacs-hook', if not void,
is a list of functions (of no args),
all of which are called before Emacs is actually killed.

15254-----(indent-region START END &optional COLUMN)
Indent each nonblank line in the region.
A numeric prefix argument specifies a column: indent each line to that column.

With no prefix argument, the command chooses one of these methods and
indents all the lines with it:

  1) If `fill-prefix' is non-nil, insert `fill-prefix' at the
     beginning of each line in the region that does not already begin
     with it.
  2) If `indent-region-function' is non-nil, call that function
     to indent the region.
  3) Indent each line via `indent-according-to-mode'.

Called from a program, START and END specify the region to indent.
If the third argument COLUMN is an integer, it specifies the
column to indent to; if it is nil, use one of the three methods above.

15254-----(indent-rigidly START END ARG &optional INTERACTIVE)
Indent all lines starting in the region.
If called interactively with no prefix argument, activate a
transient mode in which the indentation can be adjusted interactively
by typing \<indent-rigidly-map>\[indent-rigidly-left], \[indent-rigidly-right], \[indent-rigidly-left-to-tab-stop], or \[indent-rigidly-right-to-tab-stop].
Typing any other key deactivates the transient mode.

If called from a program, or interactively with prefix ARG,
indent all lines starting in the region forward by ARG columns.
If called from a program, START and END specify the beginning and
end of the text to act on, in place of the region.

Negative values of ARG indent backward, so you can remove all
indentation by specifying a large negative ARG.

15254-----(indent-code-rigidly START END ARG &optional NOCHANGE-REGEXP)
Indent all lines of code, starting in the region, sideways by ARG columns.
Does not affect lines starting inside comments or strings, assuming that
the start of the region is not inside them.

Called from a program, takes args START, END, COLUMNS and NOCHANGE-REGEXP.
The last is a regexp which, if matched at the beginning of a line,
means don't indent that line.

15254-----(play-sound-file FILE &optional VOLUME DEVICE)
Play sound stored in FILE.
VOLUME and DEVICE correspond to the keywords of the sound
specification for `play-sound'.

15254-----(forward-word &optional ARG)
Move point forward ARG words (backward if ARG is negative).
If ARG is omitted or nil, move point forward one word.
Normally returns t.
If an edge of the buffer or a field boundary is reached, point is
left there and the function returns nil.  Field boundaries are not
noticed if `inhibit-field-text-motion' is non-nil.

The word boundaries are normally determined by the buffer's syntax
table and character script (according to `char-script-table'), but
`find-word-boundary-function-table', such as set up by `subword-mode',
can change that.  If a Lisp program needs to move by words determined
strictly by the syntax table, it should use `forward-word-strictly'
instead.  See Info node `(elisp) Word Motion' for details.

15254-----(backward-word &optional ARG)
Move backward until encountering the beginning of a word.
With argument ARG, do this that many times.
If ARG is omitted or nil, move point backward one word.

The word boundaries are normally determined by the buffer's
syntax table and character script (according to
`char-script-table'), but `find-word-boundary-function-table',
such as set up by `subword-mode', can change that.  If a Lisp
program needs to move by words determined strictly by the syntax
table, it should use `backward-word-strictly' instead.  See Info
node `(elisp) Word Motion' for details.

15254-----(auto-save-mode &optional ARG)
Toggle auto-saving in the current buffer (Auto Save mode).
With a prefix argument ARG, enable Auto Save mode if ARG is
positive, and disable it otherwise.

If called from Lisp, enable the mode if ARG is omitted or nil.

15254-----(do-auto-save &optional NO-MESSAGE CURRENT-ONLY)
Auto-save all buffers that need it.
This is all buffers that have auto-saving enabled
and are changed since last auto-saved.
Auto-saving writes the buffer into a file
so that your editing is not lost if the system crashes.
This file is not the file you visited; that changes only when you save.
Normally, run the normal hook `auto-save-hook' before saving.

A non-nil NO-MESSAGE argument means do not print any message if successful.
A non-nil CURRENT-ONLY argument means save only current buffer.

15254-----(other-window COUNT &optional ALL-FRAMES)
Select another window in cyclic ordering of windows.
COUNT specifies the number of windows to skip, starting with the
selected window, before making the selection.  If COUNT is
positive, skip COUNT windows forwards.  If COUNT is negative,
skip -COUNT windows backwards.  COUNT zero means do not skip any
window, so select the selected window.  In an interactive call,
COUNT is the numeric prefix argument.  Return nil.

If the `other-window' parameter of the selected window is a
function and `ignore-window-parameters' is nil, call that
function with the arguments COUNT and ALL-FRAMES.

This function does not select a window whose `no-other-window'
window parameter is non-nil.

This function uses `next-window' for finding the window to
select.  The argument ALL-FRAMES has the same meaning as in
`next-window', but the MINIBUF argument of `next-window' is
always effectively nil.

15254-----(normal-mode &optional FIND-FILE)
Choose the major mode for this buffer automatically.
Also sets up any specified local variables of the file.
Uses the visited file name, the -*- line, and the local variables spec.

This function is called automatically from `find-file'.  In that case,
we may set up the file-specified mode and local variables,
depending on the value of `enable-local-variables'.
In addition, if `local-enable-local-variables' is nil, we do
not set local variables (though we do notice a mode specified with -*-.)

`enable-local-variables' is ignored if you run `normal-mode' interactively,
or from Lisp without specifying the optional argument FIND-FILE;
in that case, this function acts as if `enable-local-variables' were t.

15254-----fundamental-mode
Major mode not specialized for anything in particular.
Other major modes are defined by comparison with this one.(getenv VARIABLE &optional FRAME)
Get the value of environment variable VARIABLE.
VARIABLE should be a string.  Value is nil if VARIABLE is undefined in
the environment.  Otherwise, value is a string.

If optional parameter FRAME is non-nil, then it should be a
frame.  This function will look up VARIABLE in its `environment'
parameter.

Otherwise, this function searches `process-environment' for
VARIABLE.  If it is not found there, then it continues the search
in the environment list of the selected frame.

15254-----(setenv VARIABLE &optional VALUE SUBSTITUTE-ENV-VARS)
Set the value of the environment variable named VARIABLE to VALUE.
VARIABLE should be a string.  VALUE is optional; if not provided or
nil, the environment variable VARIABLE will be removed.

Interactively, a prefix argument means to unset the variable, and
otherwise the current value (if any) of the variable appears at
the front of the history list when you type in the new value.
This function always replaces environment variables in the new
value when called interactively.

SUBSTITUTE-ENV-VARS, if non-nil, means to substitute environment
variables in VALUE with `substitute-env-vars', which see.
This is normally used only for interactive calls.

The return value is the new value of VARIABLE, or nil if
it was removed from the environment.

This function works by modifying `process-environment'.

As a special case, setting variable `TZ' calls `set-time-zone-rule' as
a side-effect.

15254-----(search-forward STRING &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search forward from point for STRING.
Set point to the end of the occurrence found, and return point.
An optional second argument bounds the search; it is a buffer position.
  The match found must not end after that position.  A value of nil
  means search to the end of the accessible portion of the buffer.
Optional third argument, if t, means if fail just return nil (no error).
  If not nil and not t, move to limit of search and return nil.
Optional fourth argument COUNT, if a positive number, means to search
  for COUNT successive occurrences.  If COUNT is negative, search
  backward, instead of forward, for -COUNT occurrences.  A value of
  nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive, the match found is the COUNTth one (or first,
  if COUNT is 1 or nil) in the buffer located entirely after the
  origin of the search; correspondingly with COUNT negative.

Search case-sensitivity is determined by the value of the variable
`case-fold-search', which see.

See also the functions `match-beginning', `match-end' and `replace-match'.

15254-----(search-backward STRING &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search backward from point for STRING.
Set point to the beginning of the occurrence found, and return point.
An optional second argument bounds the search; it is a buffer position.
  The match found must not begin before that position.  A value of nil
  means search to the beginning of the accessible portion of the buffer.
Optional third argument, if t, means if fail just return nil (no error).
  If not nil and not t, position at limit of search and return nil.
Optional fourth argument COUNT, if a positive number, means to search
  for COUNT successive occurrences.  If COUNT is negative, search
  forward, instead of backward, for -COUNT occurrences.  A value of
  nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive, the match found is the COUNTth to last one (or
  last, if COUNT is 1 or nil) in the buffer located entirely before
  the origin of the search; correspondingly with COUNT negative.

Search case-sensitivity is determined by the value of the variable
`case-fold-search', which see.

See also the functions `match-beginning', `match-end' and `replace-match'.

15254-----(word-search-forward STRING &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search forward from point for STRING, ignoring differences in punctuation.
Set point to the end of the occurrence found, and return point.
An optional second argument bounds the search; it is a buffer position.
  The match found must not end after that position.  A value of nil
  means search to the end of the accessible portion of the buffer.
Optional third argument, if t, means if fail just return nil (no error).
  If not nil and not t, move to limit of search and return nil.
Optional fourth argument COUNT, if a positive number, means to search
  for COUNT successive occurrences.  If COUNT is negative, search
  backward, instead of forward, for -COUNT occurrences.  A value of
  nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive, the match found is the COUNTth one (or first,
  if COUNT is 1 or nil) in the buffer located entirely after the
  origin of the search; correspondingly with COUNT negative.

Relies on the function `word-search-regexp' to convert a sequence
of words in STRING to a regexp used to search words without regard
to punctuation.
This command does not support character folding, and lax space matching
has no effect on it.

15254-----(word-search-forward-lax STRING &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search forward from point for STRING, ignoring differences in punctuation.
Set point to the end of the occurrence found, and return point.

Unlike `word-search-forward', the end of STRING need not match a word
boundary, unless STRING ends in whitespace.

An optional second argument bounds the search; it is a buffer position.
  The match found must not end after that position.  A value of nil
  means search to the end of the accessible portion of the buffer.
Optional third argument, if t, means if fail just return nil (no error).
  If not nil and not t, move to limit of search and return nil.
Optional fourth argument COUNT, if a positive number, means to search
  for COUNT successive occurrences.  If COUNT is negative, search
  backward, instead of forward, for -COUNT occurrences.  A value of
  nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive, the match found is the COUNTth one (or first,
  if COUNT is 1 or nil) in the buffer located entirely after the
  origin of the search; correspondingly with COUNT negative.

Relies on the function `word-search-regexp' to convert a sequence
of words in STRING to a regexp used to search words without regard
to punctuation.
This command does not support character folding, and lax space matching
has no effect on it.

15254-----(word-search-backward STRING &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search backward from point for STRING, ignoring differences in punctuation.
Set point to the beginning of the occurrence found, and return point.
An optional second argument bounds the search; it is a buffer position.
  The match found must not begin before that position.  A value of nil
  means search to the beginning of the accessible portion of the buffer.
Optional third argument, if t, means if fail just return nil (no error).
  If not nil and not t, position at limit of search and return nil.
Optional fourth argument COUNT, if a positive number, means to search
  for COUNT successive occurrences.  If COUNT is negative, search
  forward, instead of backward, for -COUNT occurrences.  A value of
  nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive, the match found is the COUNTth to last one (or
  last, if COUNT is 1 or nil) in the buffer located entirely before
  the origin of the search; correspondingly with COUNT negative.

Relies on the function `word-search-regexp' to convert a sequence
of words in STRING to a regexp used to search words without regard
to punctuation.
This command does not support character folding, and lax space matching
has no effect on it.

15254-----(word-search-backward-lax STRING &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search backward from point for STRING, ignoring differences in punctuation.
Set point to the beginning of the occurrence found, and return point.

Unlike `word-search-backward', the end of STRING need not match a word
boundary, unless STRING ends in whitespace.

An optional second argument bounds the search; it is a buffer position.
  The match found must not begin before that position.  A value of nil
  means search to the beginning of the accessible portion of the buffer.
Optional third argument, if t, means if fail just return nil (no error).
  If not nil and not t, position at limit of search and return nil.
Optional fourth argument COUNT, if a positive number, means to search
  for COUNT successive occurrences.  If COUNT is negative, search
  forward, instead of backward, for -COUNT occurrences.  A value of
  nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive, the match found is the COUNTth to last one (or
  last, if COUNT is 1 or nil) in the buffer located entirely before
  the origin of the search; correspondingly with COUNT negative.

Relies on the function `word-search-regexp' to convert a sequence
of words in STRING to a regexp used to search words without regard
to punctuation.
This command does not support character folding, and lax space matching
has no effect on it.

15254-----(base64-encode-region BEG END &optional NO-LINE-BREAK)
Base64-encode the region between BEG and END.
Return the length of the encoded text.
Optional third argument NO-LINE-BREAK means do not break long lines
into shorter lines.

15254-----(base64-decode-region BEG END)
Base64-decode the region between BEG and END.
Return the length of the decoded text.
If the region can't be decoded, signal an error and don't modify the buffer.

15254-----(compile-defun &optional ARG)
Compile and evaluate the current top-level form.
Print the result in the echo area.
With argument ARG, insert value in current buffer after the form.

15254-----(byte-compile-file FILENAME &optional LOAD)
Compile a file of Lisp code named FILENAME into a file of byte code.
The output file's name is generated by passing FILENAME to the
function `byte-compile-dest-file' (which see).
With prefix arg (noninteractively: 2nd arg), LOAD the file after compiling.
The value is non-nil if there were no errors, nil if errors.

15254-----(byte-recompile-directory DIRECTORY &optional ARG FORCE)
Recompile every `.el' file in DIRECTORY that needs recompilation.
This happens when a `.elc' file exists but is older than the `.el' file.
Files in subdirectories of DIRECTORY are processed also.

If the `.elc' file does not exist, normally this function *does not*
compile the corresponding `.el' file.  However, if the prefix argument
ARG is 0, that means do compile all those files.  A nonzero
ARG means ask the user, for each such `.el' file, whether to
compile it.  A nonzero ARG also means ask about each subdirectory
before scanning it.

If the third argument FORCE is non-nil, recompile every `.el' file
that already has a `.elc' file.

15254-----(execute-extended-command PREFIXARG &optional COMMAND-NAME TYPED)
Read a command name, then read the arguments and call the command.
To pass a prefix argument to the command you are
invoking, give a prefix argument to `execute-extended-command'.

15254-----backtrace
Print a trace of Lisp function calls currently active.
Output stream used is value of `standard-output'.(make-frame-on-display DISPLAY &optional PARAMETERS)
Make a frame on display DISPLAY.
The optional argument PARAMETERS specifies additional frame parameters.

15254-----(find-file FILENAME &optional WILDCARDS)
Edit file FILENAME.
Switch to a buffer visiting file FILENAME,
creating one if none already exists.
Interactively, the default if you just type RET is the current directory,
but the visited file name is available through the minibuffer history:
type \[next-history-element] to pull it into the minibuffer.

The first time \[next-history-element] is used after Emacs prompts for
the file name, the result is affected by `file-name-at-point-functions',
which by default try to guess the file name by looking at point in the
current buffer.  Customize the value of `file-name-at-point-functions'
or set it to nil, if you want only the visited file name and the
current directory to be available on first \[next-history-element]
request.

You can visit files on remote machines by specifying something
like /ssh:SOME_REMOTE_MACHINE:FILE for the file name.  You can
also visit local files as a different user by specifying
/sudo::FILE for the file name.
See the Info node `(tramp)File name Syntax' in the Tramp Info
manual, for more about this.

Interactively, or if WILDCARDS is non-nil in a call from Lisp,
expand wildcards (if any) and visit multiple files.  You can
suppress wildcard expansion by setting `find-file-wildcards' to nil.

To visit a file without any kind of conversion and without
automatically choosing a major mode, use \[find-file-literally].

15254-----(find-file-literally FILENAME)
Visit file FILENAME with no conversion of any kind.
Format conversion and character code conversion are both disabled,
and multibyte characters are disabled in the resulting buffer.
The major mode used is Fundamental mode regardless of the file name,
and local variable specifications in the file are ignored.
Automatic uncompression and adding a newline at the end of the
file due to `require-final-newline' is also disabled.

If Emacs already has a buffer which is visiting the file,
this command asks you whether to visit it literally instead.

In non-interactive use, the value is the buffer where the file is
visited literally.  If the file was visited in a buffer before
this command was invoked, it will reuse the existing buffer,
regardless of whether it was created literally or not; however,
the contents of that buffer will be the literal text of the file
without any conversions.

In a Lisp program, if you want to be sure of accessing a file's
contents literally, you should create a temporary buffer and then read
the file contents into it using `insert-file-contents-literally'.

15254-----(find-file-other-window FILENAME &optional WILDCARDS)
Edit file FILENAME, in another window.

Like \[find-file] (which see), but creates a new window or reuses
an existing one.  See the function `display-buffer'.

Interactively, the default if you just type RET is the current directory,
but the visited file name is available through the minibuffer history:
type \[next-history-element] to pull it into the minibuffer.

The first time \[next-history-element] is used after Emacs prompts for
the file name, the result is affected by `file-name-at-point-functions',
which by default try to guess the file name by looking at point in the
current buffer.  Customize the value of `file-name-at-point-functions'
or set it to nil, if you want only the visited file name and the
current directory to be available on first \[next-history-element]
request.

Interactively, or if WILDCARDS is non-nil in a call from Lisp,
expand wildcards (if any) and visit multiple files.

15254-----(find-file-read-only FILENAME &optional WILDCARDS)
Edit file FILENAME but don't allow changes.
Like \[find-file], but marks buffer as read-only.
Use \[read-only-mode] to permit editing.

15254-----format-write-file
Write current buffer into FILENAME, using a format based on FORMAT.
Constructs the actual format starting from FORMAT, then appending
any elements from the value of `buffer-file-format' with a non-nil
`preserve' flag (see the documentation of `format-alist'), if they
are not already present in FORMAT.  It then updates `buffer-file-format'
with this format, making it the default for future saves.

If the buffer is already visiting a file, you can specify a
directory name as FILENAME, to write a file of the same old name
in that directory.

If optional third arg CONFIRM is non-nil, asks for confirmation before
overwriting an existing file.  Interactively, requires confirmation
unless you supply a prefix argument.format-find-file
Find the file FILENAME using data format FORMAT.
If FORMAT is nil then do not do any format conversion.format-insert-file
Insert the contents of file FILENAME using data format FORMAT.
If FORMAT is nil then do not do any format conversion.
The optional third and fourth arguments BEG and END specify
the part (in bytes) of the file to read.

The return value is like the value of `insert-file-contents':
a list (ABSOLUTE-FILE-NAME SIZE).(enable-command COMMAND)
Allow COMMAND to be executed without special confirmation from now on.
COMMAND must be a symbol.
This command alters the user's .emacs file so that this will apply
to future sessions.

15254-----(disable-command COMMAND)
Require special confirmation to execute COMMAND from now on.
COMMAND must be a symbol.
This command alters your init file so that this choice applies to
future sessions.

15254-----(switch-to-prev-buffer &optional WINDOW BURY-OR-KILL)
In WINDOW switch to previous buffer.
WINDOW must be a live window and defaults to the selected one.
Return the buffer switched to, nil if no suitable buffer could be
found.

Optional argument BURY-OR-KILL non-nil means the buffer currently
shown in WINDOW is about to be buried or killed and consequently
shall not be switched to in future invocations of this command.

As a special case, if BURY-OR-KILL equals `append', this means to
move the buffer to the end of WINDOW's previous buffers list so a
future invocation of `switch-to-prev-buffer' less likely switches
to it.

15254-----(switch-to-next-buffer &optional WINDOW)
In WINDOW switch to next buffer.
WINDOW must be a live window and defaults to the selected one.
Return the buffer switched to, nil if no suitable buffer could be
found.

15254-----describe-buffer-case-table
Describe the case table of the current buffer.(recursive-edit)
Invoke the editor command loop recursively.
To get out of the recursive edit, a command can throw to `exit' -- for
instance (throw \='exit nil).
If you throw a value other than t, `recursive-edit' returns normally
to the function that called it.  Throwing a t value causes
`recursive-edit' to quit, so that control returns to the command loop
one level up.

This function is called by the editor initialization to begin editing.

15254-----(exit-recursive-edit)
Exit from the innermost recursive edit or minibuffer.

15254-----(abort-recursive-edit)
Abort the command that requested this recursive edit or minibuffer input.

15254-----(top-level)
Exit all recursive editing levels.
This also exits all active minibuffers.

15254-----(replace-buffer-in-windows &optional BUFFER-OR-NAME)
Replace BUFFER-OR-NAME with some other buffer in all windows showing it.
BUFFER-OR-NAME may be a buffer or the name of an existing buffer
and defaults to the current buffer.

When a window showing BUFFER-OR-NAME is dedicated, that window is
deleted.  If that window is the only window on its frame, the
frame is deleted too when there are other frames left.  If there
are no other frames left, some other buffer is displayed in that
window.

This function removes the buffer denoted by BUFFER-OR-NAME from
all window-local buffer lists.

15254-----(goto-char POSITION)
Set point to POSITION, a number or marker.
Beginning of buffer is position (point-min), end is (point-max).

The return value is POSITION.

15254-----(forward-char &optional N)
Move point N characters forward (backward if N is negative).
On reaching end or beginning of buffer, stop and signal error.
Interactively, N is the numeric prefix argument.
If N is omitted or nil, move point 1 character forward.

Depending on the bidirectional context, the movement may be to the
right or to the left on the screen.  This is in contrast with
\[right-char], which see.

15254-----(backward-char &optional N)
Move point N characters backward (forward if N is negative).
On attempt to pass beginning or end of buffer, stop and signal error.
Interactively, N is the numeric prefix argument.
If N is omitted or nil, move point 1 character backward.

Depending on the bidirectional context, the movement may be to the
right or to the left on the screen.  This is in contrast with
\[left-char], which see.

15254-----(set-face-foreground FACE COLOR &optional FRAME)
Change the foreground color of face FACE to COLOR (a string).
FRAME nil or not specified means change face on all frames.
COLOR can be a system-defined color name (see `list-colors-display')
or a hex spec of the form #RRGGBB.
When called interactively, prompts for the face and color.

15254-----(set-face-background FACE COLOR &optional FRAME)
Change the background color of face FACE to COLOR (a string).
FRAME nil or not specified means change face on all frames.
COLOR can be a system-defined color name (see `list-colors-display')
or a hex spec of the form #RRGGBB.
When called interactively, prompts for the face and color.

15254-----(set-face-stipple FACE STIPPLE &optional FRAME)
Change the stipple pixmap of face FACE to STIPPLE.
FRAME nil or not specified means change face on all frames.
STIPPLE should be a string, the name of a file of pixmap data.
The directories listed in the `x-bitmap-file-path' variable are searched.

Alternatively, STIPPLE may be a list of the form (WIDTH HEIGHT DATA)
where WIDTH and HEIGHT are the size in pixels,
and DATA is a string, containing the raw bits of the bitmap.

15254-----(set-face-font FACE FONT &optional FRAME)
Change font-related attributes of FACE to those of FONT (a string).
FRAME nil or not specified means change face on all frames.
This sets the attributes `:family', `:foundry', `:width',
`:height', `:weight', and `:slant'.  When called interactively,
prompt for the face and font.

15254-----(invert-face FACE &optional FRAME)
Swap the foreground and background colors of FACE.
If FRAME is omitted or nil, it means change face on all frames.
If FACE specifies neither foreground nor background color,
set its foreground and background to the background and foreground
of the default face.  Value is FACE.

15254-----translate-region
From START to END, translate characters according to TABLE.
TABLE is a string or a char-table.
If TABLE is a string, the Nth character in it is the mapping
for the character with code N.
If TABLE is a char-table, the element for character N is the mapping
for the character with code N.
It returns the number of characters changed.(run-with-idle-timer SECS REPEAT FUNCTION &rest ARGS)
Perform an action the next time Emacs is idle for SECS seconds.
The action is to call FUNCTION with arguments ARGS.
SECS may be an integer, a floating point number, or the internal
time format returned by, e.g., `current-idle-time'.
If Emacs is currently idle, and has been idle for N seconds (N < SECS),
then it will call FUNCTION in SECS - N seconds from now.  Using
SECS <= N is not recommended if this function is invoked from an idle
timer, because FUNCTION will then be called immediately.

If REPEAT is non-nil, do the action each time Emacs has been idle for
exactly SECS seconds (that is, only once for each time Emacs becomes idle).

This function returns a timer object which you can use in `cancel-timer'.

15254-----(delete-window &optional WINDOW)
Delete WINDOW.
WINDOW must be a valid window and defaults to the selected one.
Return nil.

If the variable `ignore-window-parameters' is non-nil or the
`delete-window' parameter of WINDOW equals t, do not process any
parameters of WINDOW.  Otherwise, if the `delete-window'
parameter of WINDOW specifies a function, call that function with
WINDOW as its sole argument and return the value returned by that
function.

Otherwise, if WINDOW is part of an atomic window, call
`delete-window' with the root of the atomic window as its
argument.  Signal an error if WINDOW is either the only window on
its frame, the last non-side window, or part of an atomic window
that is its frame's root window.

15254-----(delete-other-windows &optional WINDOW)
Make WINDOW fill its frame.
WINDOW must be a valid window and defaults to the selected one.
Return nil.

If the variable `ignore-window-parameters' is non-nil or the
`delete-other-windows' parameter of WINDOW equals t, do not pay
attention to any other parameters of WINDOW.  Otherwise, if the
`delete-other-windows' parameter of WINDOW specifies a function,
call that function with WINDOW as its sole argument and return
the value returned by that function.

Else, if WINDOW is part of an atomic window, call this function
with the root of the atomic window as its argument.  Signal an
error if that root window is the root window of WINDOW's frame.
Also signal an error if WINDOW is a side window.  Do not delete
any window whose `no-delete-other-windows' parameter is non-nil.

15254-----(delete-windows-on &optional BUFFER-OR-NAME FRAME)
Delete all windows showing BUFFER-OR-NAME.
BUFFER-OR-NAME may be a buffer or the name of an existing buffer
and defaults to the current buffer.

The following non-nil values of the optional argument FRAME
have special meanings:

- t means consider all windows on the selected frame only.

- `visible' means consider all windows on all visible frames on
  the current terminal.

- 0 (the number zero) means consider all windows on all visible
  and iconified frames on the current terminal.

- A frame means consider all windows on that frame only.

Any other value of FRAME means consider all windows on all
frames.

When a window showing BUFFER-OR-NAME is dedicated and the only
window of its frame, that frame is deleted when there are other
frames left.

15254-----describe-mode
Display documentation of current major mode and minor modes.
A brief summary of the minor modes comes first, followed by the
major mode description.  This is followed by detailed
descriptions of the minor modes, each on a separate page.

For this to work correctly for a minor mode, the mode's indicator
variable (listed in `minor-mode-alist') must also be a function
whose documentation describes the minor mode.

If called from Lisp with a non-nil BUFFER argument, display
documentation for the major and minor modes of that buffer.(select-frame FRAME &optional NORECORD)
Select FRAME.
Subsequent editing commands apply to its selected window.
Optional argument NORECORD means to neither change the order of
recently selected windows nor the buffer list.

The selection of FRAME lasts until the next time the user does
something to select a different frame, or until the next time
this function is called.  If you are using a window system, the
previously selected frame may be restored as the selected frame
when returning to the command loop, because it still may have
the window system's input focus.  On a text terminal, the next
redisplay will display FRAME.

This function returns FRAME, or nil if FRAME has been deleted.

15254-----(handle-switch-frame EVENT)
Handle a switch-frame event EVENT.
Switch-frame events are usually bound to this function.
A switch-frame event tells Emacs that the window manager has requested
that the user's events be directed to the frame mentioned in the event.
This function selects the selected window of the frame of EVENT.

If EVENT is frame object, handle it as if it were a switch-frame event
to that frame.

15254-----(redraw-display)
Clear and redisplay all visible frames.

15254-----(apropos PATTERN &optional DO-ALL)
Show all meaningful Lisp symbols whose names match PATTERN.
Symbols are shown if they are defined as functions, variables, or
faces, or if they have nonempty property lists.

PATTERN can be a word, a list of words (separated by spaces),
or a regexp (using some regexp special characters).  If it is a word,
search for matches for that word as a substring.  If it is a list of words,
search for matches for any two (or more) of those words.

With \[universal-argument] prefix, or if `apropos-do-all' is non-nil,
consider all symbols (if they match PATTERN).

Returns list of symbols and documentation found.

15254-----describe-prefix-bindings
Describe the bindings of the prefix used to reach this command.
The prefix described consists of all but the last event
of the key sequence that ran this command.(Helper-describe-bindings)
Describe local key bindings of current mode.

15254-----(Helper-help)
Provide help for current mode.

15254-----(revert-buffer &optional IGNORE-AUTO NOCONFIRM PRESERVE-MODES)
Replace current buffer text with the text of the visited file on disk.
This undoes all changes since the file was visited or saved.
With a prefix argument, offer to revert from latest auto-save file, if
that is more recent than the visited file.

This command also implements an interface for special buffers
that contain text which doesn't come from a file, but reflects
some other data instead (e.g. Dired buffers, `buffer-list'
buffers).  This is done via the variable `revert-buffer-function'.
In these cases, it should reconstruct the buffer contents from the
appropriate data.

When called from Lisp, the first argument is IGNORE-AUTO; only offer
to revert from the auto-save file when this is nil.  Note that the
sense of this argument is the reverse of the prefix argument, for the
sake of backward compatibility.  IGNORE-AUTO is optional, defaulting
to nil.

Optional second argument NOCONFIRM means don't ask for confirmation
at all.  (The variable `revert-without-query' offers another way to
revert buffers without querying for confirmation.)

Optional third argument PRESERVE-MODES non-nil means don't alter
the files modes.  Normally we reinitialize them using `normal-mode'.

This function binds `revert-buffer-in-progress-p' non-nil while it operates.

This function calls the function that `revert-buffer-function' specifies
to do the work, with arguments IGNORE-AUTO and NOCONFIRM.
The default function runs the hooks `before-revert-hook' and
`after-revert-hook'.

15254-----(narrow-to-region START END)
Restrict editing in this buffer to the current region.
The rest of the text becomes temporarily invisible and untouchable
but is not deleted; if you save the buffer in a file, the invisible
text is included in the file.  \[widen] makes all visible again.
See also `save-restriction'.

When calling from a program, pass two arguments; positions (integers
or markers) bounding the text that should remain visible.

15254-----narrow-to-page
Make text outside current page invisible.
A numeric arg specifies to move forward or backward by that many pages,
thus showing a page other than the one point was originally in.(widen)
Remove restrictions (narrowing) from current buffer.
This allows the buffer's full text to be seen and edited.

15254-----(disassemble OBJECT &optional BUFFER INDENT INTERACTIVE-P)
Print disassembled code for OBJECT in (optional) BUFFER.
OBJECT can be a symbol defined as a function, or a function itself
(a lambda expression or a compiled-function object).
If OBJECT is not already compiled, we compile it, but do not
redefine OBJECT if it is a symbol.

15254-----(encode-coding-region START END CODING-SYSTEM &optional DESTINATION)
Encode the current region by specified coding system.
When called from a program, takes four arguments:
        START, END, CODING-SYSTEM and DESTINATION.
START and END are buffer positions.

Optional 4th argument DESTINATION specifies where the encoded text goes.
If nil, the region between START and END is replaced by the encoded text.
If buffer, the encoded text is inserted in that buffer after point (point
does not move).
In those cases, the length of the encoded text is returned.
If DESTINATION is t, the encoded text is returned.

This function sets `last-coding-system-used' to the precise coding system
used (which may be different from CODING-SYSTEM if CODING-SYSTEM is
not fully specified.)

15254-----(decode-coding-region START END CODING-SYSTEM &optional DESTINATION)
Decode the current region from the specified coding system.
When called from a program, takes four arguments:
	START, END, CODING-SYSTEM, and DESTINATION.
START and END are buffer positions.

Optional 4th arguments DESTINATION specifies where the decoded text goes.
If nil, the region between START and END is replaced by the decoded text.
If buffer, the decoded text is inserted in that buffer after point (point
does not move).
In those cases, the length of the decoded text is returned.
If DESTINATION is t, the decoded text is returned.

This function sets `last-coding-system-used' to the precise coding system
used (which may be different from CODING-SYSTEM if CODING-SYSTEM is
not fully specified.)

15254-----(imenu-add-to-menubar NAME)
Add an `imenu' entry to the menu bar for the current buffer.
NAME is a string used to name the menu bar item.
See the command `imenu' for more information.

15254-----set-keyboard-coding-system
Set coding system for keyboard input on TERMINAL to CODING-SYSTEM.

For a list of possible values of CODING-SYSTEM, use \[list-coding-systems].
The default is determined by the selected language environment
or by the previous use of this command.

If CODING-SYSTEM is nil or the coding-type of CODING-SYSTEM is
`raw-text', the decoding of keyboard input is disabled.

TERMINAL may be a terminal object, a frame, or nil for the
selected frame's terminal.  The setting has no effect on
graphical terminals.set-terminal-coding-system
Set coding system of terminal output to CODING-SYSTEM.
All text output to TERMINAL will be encoded
with the specified coding system.

For a list of possible values of CODING-SYSTEM, use \[list-coding-systems].
The default is determined by the selected language environment
or by the previous use of this command.

TERMINAL may be a terminal object, a frame, or nil for the
selected frame's terminal.  The setting has no effect on
graphical terminals.(move-to-window-line ARG)
Position point relative to window.
ARG nil means position point at center of window.
Else, ARG specifies vertical position within the window;
zero means top of window, negative means relative to bottom
of window, -1 meaning the last fully visible display line
of the window.

Value is the screen line of the window point moved to, counting
from the top of the window.

15254-----(display-buffer BUFFER-OR-NAME &optional ACTION FRAME)
Display BUFFER-OR-NAME in some window, without selecting it.
BUFFER-OR-NAME must be a buffer or the name of an existing
buffer.  Return the window chosen for displaying BUFFER-OR-NAME,
or nil if no such window is found.

Optional argument ACTION, if non-nil, should specify a display
action.  Its form is described below.

Optional argument FRAME, if non-nil, acts like an additional
ALIST entry (reusable-frames . FRAME) to the action list of ACTION,
specifying the frame(s) to search for a window that is already
displaying the buffer.  See `display-buffer-reuse-window'.

If ACTION is non-nil, it should have the form (FUNCTION . ALIST),
where FUNCTION is either a function or a list of functions, and
ALIST is an arbitrary association list (alist).

Each such FUNCTION should accept two arguments: the buffer to
display and an alist.  Based on those arguments, it should
display the buffer and return the window.  If the caller is
prepared to handle the case of not displaying the buffer
and returning nil from `display-buffer' it should pass
(allow-no-window . t) as an element of the ALIST.

The `display-buffer' function builds a function list and an alist
by combining the functions and alists specified in
`display-buffer-overriding-action', `display-buffer-alist', the
ACTION argument, `display-buffer-base-action', and
`display-buffer-fallback-action' (in order).  Then it calls each
function in the combined function list in turn, passing the
buffer as the first argument and the combined alist as the second
argument, until one of the functions returns non-nil.

If ACTION is nil, the function list and the alist are built using
only the other variables mentioned above.

Available action functions include:
 `display-buffer-same-window'
 `display-buffer-reuse-window'
 `display-buffer-pop-up-frame'
 `display-buffer-in-child-frame'
 `display-buffer-pop-up-window'
 `display-buffer-in-previous-window'
 `display-buffer-use-some-window'
 `display-buffer-use-some-frame'

Recognized alist entries include:

 `inhibit-same-window' -- A non-nil value prevents the same
                          window from being used for display.

 `inhibit-switch-frame' -- A non-nil value prevents any other
                           frame from being raised or selected,
                           even if the window is displayed there.

 `reusable-frames' -- Value specifies frame(s) to search for a
                      window that already displays the buffer.
                      See `display-buffer-reuse-window'.

 `pop-up-frame-parameters' -- Value specifies an alist of frame
                              parameters to give a new frame, if
                              one is created.

 `window-height' -- Value specifies either an integer (the number
    of lines of a new window), a floating point number (the
    fraction of a new window with respect to the height of the
    frame's root window) or a function to be called with one
    argument - a new window.  The function is supposed to adjust
    the height of the window; its return value is ignored.
    Suitable functions are `shrink-window-if-larger-than-buffer'
    and `fit-window-to-buffer'.

 `window-width' -- Value specifies either an integer (the number
    of columns of a new window), a floating point number (the
    fraction of a new window with respect to the width of the
    frame's root window) or a function to be called with one
    argument - a new window.  The function is supposed to adjust
    the width of the window; its return value is ignored.

 `allow-no-window' -- A non-nil value indicates readiness for the case
    of not displaying the buffer and FUNCTION can safely return
    a non-window value to suppress displaying.

 `preserve-size' -- Value should be either (t . nil) to
    preserve the width of the window, (nil . t) to preserve its
    height or (t . t) to preserve both.

 `window-parameters' -- Value specifies an alist of window
                        parameters to give the chosen window.

The ACTION argument to `display-buffer' can also have a non-nil
and non-list value.  This means to display the buffer in a window
other than the selected one, even if it is already displayed in
the selected window.  If called interactively with a prefix
argument, ACTION is t.

15254-----keyboard-quit
Signal a `quit' condition.
During execution of Lisp code, this character causes a quit directly.
At top-level, as an editor command, this simply beeps.(open-dribble-file FILE)
Start writing all keyboard characters to a dribble file called FILE.
If FILE is nil, close any open dribble file.
The file will be closed when Emacs exits.

Be aware that this records ALL characters you type!
This may include sensitive information such as passwords.

15254-----(make-local-variable VARIABLE)
Make VARIABLE have a separate value in the current buffer.
Other buffers will continue to share a common default value.
(The buffer-local value of VARIABLE starts out as the same value
VARIABLE previously had.  If VARIABLE was void, it remains void.)
Return VARIABLE.

If the variable is already arranged to become local when set,
this function causes a local value to exist for this buffer,
just as setting the variable would do.

This function returns VARIABLE, and therefore
  (set (make-local-variable \='VARIABLE) VALUE-EXP)
works.

See also `make-variable-buffer-local'.

Do not use `make-local-variable' to make a hook variable buffer-local.
Instead, use `add-hook' and specify t for the LOCAL argument.

15254-----(make-variable-buffer-local VARIABLE)
Make VARIABLE become buffer-local whenever it is set.
At any time, the value for the current buffer is in effect,
unless the variable has never been set in this buffer,
in which case the default value is in effect.
Note that binding the variable with `let', or setting it while
a `let'-style binding made in this buffer is in effect,
does not make the variable buffer-local.  Return VARIABLE.

This globally affects all uses of this variable, so it belongs together with
the variable declaration, rather than with its uses (if you just want to make
a variable local to the current buffer for one particular use, use
`make-local-variable').  Buffer-local bindings are normally cleared
while setting up a new major mode, unless they have a `permanent-local'
property.

The function `default-value' gets the default value and `set-default' sets it.

15254-----(kill-local-variable VARIABLE)
Make VARIABLE no longer have a separate value in the current buffer.
From now on the default value will apply in this buffer.  Return VARIABLE.

15254-----(rename-buffer NEWNAME &optional UNIQUE)
:around advice: uniquify--rename-buffer-advice

Change current buffer's name to NEWNAME (a string).
If second arg UNIQUE is nil or omitted, it is an error if a
buffer named NEWNAME already exists.
If UNIQUE is non-nil, come up with a new name using
`generate-new-buffer-name'.
Interactively, you can set UNIQUE with a prefix argument.
We return the name we actually gave the buffer.
This does not change the name of the visited file (if any).

15254-----describe-bindings
Display a buffer showing a list of all defined keys, and their definitions.
The keys are displayed in order of precedence.

The optional argument PREFIX, if non-nil, should be a key sequence;
then we display only bindings that start with that prefix.
The optional argument BUFFER specifies which buffer's bindings
to display (default, the current buffer).  BUFFER can be a buffer
or a buffer name.(move-to-column COLUMN &optional FORCE)
Move point to column COLUMN in the current line.
Interactively, COLUMN is the value of prefix numeric argument.
The column of a character is calculated by adding together the widths
as displayed of the previous characters in the line.
This function ignores line-continuation;
there is no upper limit on the column number a character can have
and horizontal scrolling has no effect.

If specified column is within a character, point goes after that character.
If it's past end of line, point goes to end of line.

Optional second argument FORCE non-nil means if COLUMN is in the
middle of a tab character, change it to spaces.
In addition, if FORCE is t, and the line is too short to reach
COLUMN, add spaces/tabs to get there.

The return value is the current column.

15254-----(eval-region START END &optional PRINTFLAG READ-FUNCTION)
Execute the region as Lisp code.
When called from programs, expects two arguments,
giving starting and ending indices in the current buffer
of the text to be executed.
Programs can pass third argument PRINTFLAG which controls output:
 a value of nil means discard it; anything else is stream for printing it.
 See Info node `(elisp)Output Streams' for details on streams.
Also the fourth argument READ-FUNCTION, if non-nil, is used
instead of `read' to read each expression.  It gets one argument
which is the input stream for reading characters.

This function does not move point.

15254-----(eval-buffer &optional BUFFER PRINTFLAG FILENAME UNIBYTE DO-ALLOW-PRINT)
Execute the accessible portion of current buffer as Lisp code.
You can use \[narrow-to-region] to limit the part of buffer to be evaluated.
When called from a Lisp program (i.e., not interactively), this
function accepts up to five optional arguments:
BUFFER is the buffer to evaluate (nil means use current buffer),
 or a name of a buffer (a string).
PRINTFLAG controls printing of output by any output functions in the
 evaluated code, such as `print', `princ', and `prin1':
  a value of nil means discard it; anything else is the stream to print to.
  See Info node `(elisp)Output Streams' for details on streams.
FILENAME specifies the file name to use for `load-history'.
UNIBYTE, if non-nil, specifies `load-convert-to-unibyte' for this
 invocation.
DO-ALLOW-PRINT, if non-nil, specifies that output functions in the
 evaluated code should work normally even if PRINTFLAG is nil, in
 which case the output is displayed in the echo area.

This function preserves the position of point.

15254-----(package-initialize &optional NO-ACTIVATE)
Load Emacs Lisp packages, and activate them.
The variable `package-load-list' controls which packages to load.
If optional arg NO-ACTIVATE is non-nil, don't activate packages.
If `user-init-file' does not mention `(package-initialize)', add
it to the file.
If called as part of loading `user-init-file', set
`package-enable-at-startup' to nil, to prevent accidentally
loading packages twice.
It is not necessary to adjust `load-path' or `require' the
individual packages after calling `package-initialize' -- this is
taken care of by `package-initialize'.

15254-----(insert-buffer BUFFER)
Insert after point the contents of BUFFER.
Puts mark after the inserted text.
BUFFER may be a buffer or a buffer name.

15254-----(self-insert-command N)
Insert the character you type.
Whichever character you type to run this command is inserted.
The numeric prefix argument N says how many times to repeat the insertion.
Before insertion, `expand-abbrev' is executed if the inserted character does
not have word syntax and the previous character in the buffer does.
After insertion, `internal-auto-fill' is called if
`auto-fill-function' is non-nil and if the `auto-fill-chars' table has
a non-nil value for the inserted character.  At the end, it runs
`post-self-insert-hook'.

15254-----(newline &optional ARG INTERACTIVE)
Insert a newline, and move to left margin of the new line if it's blank.
If option `use-hard-newlines' is non-nil, the newline is marked with the
text-property `hard'.
With ARG, insert that many newlines.

If `electric-indent-mode' is enabled, this indents the final new line
that it adds, and reindents the preceding line.  To just insert
a newline, use \[electric-indent-just-newline].

Calls `auto-fill-function' if the current column number is greater
than the value of `fill-column' and ARG is nil.
A non-nil INTERACTIVE argument means to run the `post-self-insert-hook'.

15254-----(list-processes &optional QUERY-ONLY BUFFER)
Display a list of all processes that are Emacs sub-processes.
If optional argument QUERY-ONLY is non-nil, only processes with
the query-on-exit flag set are listed.
Any process listed as exited or signaled is actually eliminated
after the listing is made.
Optional argument BUFFER specifies a buffer to use, instead of
"*Process List*".
The return value is always nil.

This function lists only processes that were launched by Emacs.  To
see other processes running on the system, use `list-system-processes'.

15254-----(quit-window &optional KILL WINDOW)
Quit WINDOW and bury its buffer.
WINDOW must be a live window and defaults to the selected one.
With prefix argument KILL non-nil, kill the buffer instead of
burying it.

According to information stored in WINDOW's `quit-restore' window
parameter either (1) delete WINDOW and its frame, (2) delete
WINDOW, (3) restore the buffer previously displayed in WINDOW,
or (4) make WINDOW display some other buffer than the present
one.  If non-nil, reset `quit-restore' parameter to nil.

15254-----(sort-regexp-fields REVERSE RECORD-REGEXP KEY-REGEXP BEG END)
Sort the text in the region lexicographically.
If called interactively, prompt for two regular expressions,
RECORD-REGEXP and KEY-REGEXP.

RECORD-REGEXP specifies the textual units to be sorted.
  For example, to sort lines, RECORD-REGEXP would be "^.*$".

KEY-REGEXP specifies the part of each record (i.e. each match for
  RECORD-REGEXP) to be used for sorting.
  If it is "\\digit", use the digit'th "\\(...\\)"
  match field specified by RECORD-REGEXP.
  If it is "\\&", use the whole record.
  Otherwise, KEY-REGEXP should be a regular expression with which
  to search within the record.  If a match for KEY-REGEXP is not
  found within a record, that record is ignored.

With a negative prefix arg, sort in reverse order.

The variable `sort-fold-case' determines whether alphabetic case affects
the sort order.

For example: to sort lines in the region by the first word on each line
 starting with the letter "f",
 RECORD-REGEXP would be "^.*$" and KEY would be "\\=\<f\\w*\\>"

15254-----(sort-lines REVERSE BEG END)
Sort lines in region alphabetically; argument means descending order.
Called from a program, there are three arguments:
REVERSE (non-nil means reverse order), BEG and END (region to sort).
The variable `sort-fold-case' determines whether alphabetic case affects
the sort order.

15254-----(sort-paragraphs REVERSE BEG END)
Sort paragraphs in region alphabetically; argument means descending order.
Called from a program, there are three arguments:
REVERSE (non-nil means reverse order), BEG and END (region to sort).
The variable `sort-fold-case' determines whether alphabetic case affects
the sort order.

15254-----(sort-pages REVERSE BEG END)
Sort pages in region alphabetically; argument means descending order.
Called from a program, there are three arguments:
REVERSE (non-nil means reverse order), BEG and END (region to sort).
The variable `sort-fold-case' determines whether alphabetic case affects
the sort order.

15254-----(sort-fields FIELD BEG END)
Sort lines in region lexicographically by the ARGth field of each line.
Fields are separated by whitespace and numbered from 1 up.
With a negative arg, sorts by the ARGth field counted from the right.
Called from a program, there are three arguments:
FIELD, BEG and END.  BEG and END specify region to sort.
The variable `sort-fold-case' determines whether alphabetic case affects
the sort order.

15254-----(sort-numeric-fields FIELD BEG END)
Sort lines in region numerically by the ARGth field of each line.
Fields are separated by whitespace and numbered from 1 up.
Specified field must contain a number in each line of the region,
which may begin with "0x" or "0" for hexadecimal and octal values.
Otherwise, the number is interpreted according to sort-numeric-base.
With a negative arg, sorts by the ARGth field counted from the right.
Called from a program, there are three arguments:
FIELD, BEG and END.  BEG and END specify region to sort.

15254-----(sort-columns REVERSE &optional BEG END)
Sort lines in region alphabetically by a certain range of columns.
For the purpose of this command, the region BEG...END includes
the entire line that point is in and the entire line the mark is in.
The column positions of point and mark bound the range of columns to sort on.
A prefix argument means sort into REVERSE order.
The variable `sort-fold-case' determines whether alphabetic case affects
the sort order.

Note that `sort-columns' rejects text that contains tabs,
because tabs could be split across the specified columns
and it doesn't know how to handle that.  Also, when possible,
it uses the `sort' utility program, which doesn't understand tabs.
Use \[untabify] to convert tabs to spaces before sorting.

15254-----(set-left-margin FROM TO WIDTH)
Set the left margin of the region to WIDTH.
If `auto-fill-mode' is active, re-fill the region to fit the new margin.

Interactively, WIDTH is the prefix argument, if specified.
Without prefix argument, the command prompts for WIDTH.

15254-----(set-right-margin FROM TO WIDTH)
Set the right margin of the region to WIDTH.
If `auto-fill-mode' is active, re-fill the region to fit the new margin.

Interactively, WIDTH is the prefix argument, if specified.
Without prefix argument, the command prompts for WIDTH.

15254-----(move-to-left-margin &optional N FORCE)
Move to the left margin of the current line.
With optional argument, move forward N-1 lines first.
The column moved to is the one given by the `current-left-margin' function.
If the line's indentation appears to be wrong, and this command is called
interactively or with optional argument FORCE, it will be fixed.

15254-----(add-name-to-file FILE NEWNAME &optional OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS)
Give FILE additional name NEWNAME.  Both args must be strings.
If NEWNAME is a directory name, give FILE a like-named new name under
NEWNAME.

Signal a `file-already-exists' error if a file NEWNAME already exists
unless optional third argument OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS is non-nil.
An integer third arg means request confirmation if NEWNAME already exists.
This is what happens in interactive use with M-x.

15254-----(rename-file FILE NEWNAME &optional OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS)
Rename FILE as NEWNAME.  Both args must be strings.
If file has names other than FILE, it continues to have those names.
If NEWNAME is a directory name, rename FILE to a like-named file under
NEWNAME.  For NEWNAME to be recognized as a directory name, it should
end in a slash.

Signal a `file-already-exists' error if a file NEWNAME already exists
unless optional third argument OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS is non-nil.
An integer third arg means request confirmation if NEWNAME already exists.
This is what happens in interactive use with M-x.

15254-----(copy-file FILE NEWNAME &optional OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS KEEP-TIME PRESERVE-UID-GID PRESERVE-PERMISSIONS)
Copy FILE to NEWNAME.  Both args must be strings.
If NEWNAME is a directory name, copy FILE to a like-named file under
NEWNAME.  For NEWNAME to be recognized as a directory name, it should
end in a slash.

This function always sets the file modes of the output file to match
the input file.

The optional third argument OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS specifies what to do
if file NEWNAME already exists.  If OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS is nil,
signal a `file-already-exists' error without overwriting.  If
OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS is an integer, request confirmation from the user
about overwriting; this is what happens in interactive use with M-x.
Any other value for OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS means to overwrite the
existing file.

Fourth arg KEEP-TIME non-nil means give the output file the same
last-modified time as the old one.  (This works on only some systems.)

A prefix arg makes KEEP-TIME non-nil.

If PRESERVE-UID-GID is non-nil, try to transfer the uid and gid of
FILE to NEWNAME.

If PRESERVE-PERMISSIONS is non-nil, copy permissions of FILE to NEWNAME;
this includes the file modes, along with ACL entries and SELinux
context if present.  Otherwise, if NEWNAME is created its file
permission bits are those of FILE, masked by the default file
permissions.

15254-----(make-symbolic-link TARGET LINKNAME &optional OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS)
Make a symbolic link to TARGET, named NEWNAME.
If NEWNAME is a directory name, make a like-named symbolic link under
NEWNAME.

Signal a `file-already-exists' error if a file NEWNAME already exists
unless optional third argument OK-IF-ALREADY-EXISTS is non-nil.
An integer third arg means request confirmation if NEWNAME already
exists, and expand leading "~" or strip leading "/:" in TARGET.
This happens for interactive use with M-x.

15254-----(delete-file FILENAME &optional TRASH)
Delete file named FILENAME.  If it is a symlink, remove the symlink.
If file has multiple names, it continues to exist with the other names.
TRASH non-nil means to trash the file instead of deleting, provided
`delete-by-moving-to-trash' is non-nil.

When called interactively, TRASH is t if no prefix argument is given.
With a prefix argument, TRASH is nil.

15254-----(set-file-modes FILENAME MODE)
Set mode bits of file named FILENAME to MODE (an integer).
Only the 12 low bits of MODE are used.

Interactively, mode bits are read by `read-file-modes', which accepts
symbolic notation, like the `chmod' command from GNU Coreutils.

15254-----(insert-char CHARACTER &optional COUNT INHERIT)
Insert COUNT copies of CHARACTER.
Interactively, prompt for CHARACTER.  You can specify CHARACTER in one
of these ways:

 - As its Unicode character name, e.g. "LATIN SMALL LETTER A".
   Completion is available; if you type a substring of the name
   preceded by an asterisk `*', Emacs shows all names which include
   that substring, not necessarily at the beginning of the name.

 - As a hexadecimal code point, e.g. 263A.  Note that code points in
   Emacs are equivalent to Unicode up to 10FFFF (which is the limit of
   the Unicode code space).

 - As a code point with a radix specified with #, e.g. #o21430
   (octal), #x2318 (hex), or #10r8984 (decimal).

If called interactively, COUNT is given by the prefix argument.  If
omitted or nil, it defaults to 1.

Inserting the character(s) relocates point and before-insertion
markers in the same ways as the function `insert'.

The optional third argument INHERIT, if non-nil, says to inherit text
properties from adjoining text, if those properties are sticky.  If
called interactively, INHERIT is t.

15254-----emacs-version
Return string describing the version of Emacs that is running.
If optional argument HERE is non-nil, insert string at point.
Don't use this function in programs to choose actions according
to the system configuration; look at `system-configuration' instead.(iconify-frame &optional FRAME)
Make the frame FRAME into an icon.
If omitted, FRAME defaults to the currently selected frame.

If FRAME is a child frame, consult the variable `iconify-child-frame'
for how to proceed.

15254-----(make-frame-visible &optional FRAME)
Make the frame FRAME visible (assuming it is an X window).
If omitted, FRAME defaults to the currently selected frame.

15254-----(make-frame-invisible &optional FRAME FORCE)
Make the frame FRAME invisible.
If omitted, FRAME defaults to the currently selected frame.
On graphical displays, invisible frames are not updated and are
usually not displayed at all, even in a window system's "taskbar".

Normally you may not make FRAME invisible if all other frames are invisible,
but if the second optional argument FORCE is non-nil, you may do so.

This function has no effect on text terminal frames.  Such frames are
always considered visible, whether or not they are currently being
displayed in the terminal.

15254-----minibuffer-inactive-mode
Major-mode.
Uses keymap `minibuffer-inactive-mode-map' and syntax-table `minibuffer-inactive-mode-syntax-table'.

This mode runs the hook `minibuffer-inactive-mode-hook', as the final or penultimate step
during initialization.

\{minibuffer-inactive-mode-map}(scroll-up &optional ARG)
Scroll text of selected window upward ARG lines.
If ARG is omitted or nil, scroll upward by a near full screen.
A near full screen is `next-screen-context-lines' less than a full screen.
Negative ARG means scroll downward.
If ARG is the atom `-', scroll downward by nearly full screen.
When calling from a program, supply as argument a number, nil, or `-'.

15254-----(scroll-down &optional ARG)
Scroll text of selected window down ARG lines.
If ARG is omitted or nil, scroll down by a near full screen.
A near full screen is `next-screen-context-lines' less than a full screen.
Negative ARG means scroll upward.
If ARG is the atom `-', scroll upward by nearly full screen.
When calling from a program, supply as argument a number, nil, or `-'.

15254-----(scroll-up-command &optional ARG)
Scroll text of selected window upward ARG lines; or near full screen if no ARG.
If `scroll-error-top-bottom' is non-nil and `scroll-up' cannot
scroll window further, move cursor to the bottom line.
When point is already on that position, then signal an error.
A near full screen is `next-screen-context-lines' less than a full screen.
Negative ARG means scroll downward.
If ARG is the atom `-', scroll downward by nearly full screen.

15254-----(scroll-down-command &optional ARG)
Scroll text of selected window down ARG lines; or near full screen if no ARG.
If `scroll-error-top-bottom' is non-nil and `scroll-down' cannot
scroll window further, move cursor to the top line.
When point is already on that position, then signal an error.
A near full screen is `next-screen-context-lines' less than a full screen.
Negative ARG means scroll upward.
If ARG is the atom `-', scroll upward by nearly full screen.

15254-----(scroll-other-window &optional ARG)
Scroll next window upward ARG lines; or near full screen if no ARG.
A near full screen is `next-screen-context-lines' less than a full screen.
The next window is the one below the current one; or the one at the top
if the current one is at the bottom.  Negative ARG means scroll downward.
If ARG is the atom `-', scroll downward by nearly full screen.
When calling from a program, supply as argument a number, nil, or `-'.

If `other-window-scroll-buffer' is non-nil, scroll the window
showing that buffer, popping the buffer up if necessary.
If in the minibuffer, `minibuffer-scroll-window' if non-nil
specifies the window to scroll.  This takes precedence over
`other-window-scroll-buffer'.

15254-----(recenter &optional ARG)
Center point in selected window and maybe redisplay frame.
With a numeric prefix argument ARG, recenter putting point on screen line ARG
relative to the selected window.  If ARG is negative, it counts up from the
bottom of the window.  (ARG should be less than the height of the window.)

If ARG is omitted or nil, then recenter with point on the middle line of
the selected window; if the variable `recenter-redisplay' is non-nil,
also erase the entire frame and redraw it (when `auto-resize-tool-bars'
is set to `grow-only', this resets the tool-bar's height to the minimum
height needed); if `recenter-redisplay' has the special value `tty',
then only tty frames are redrawn.

Just C-u as prefix means put point in the center of the window
and redisplay normally--don't erase and redraw the frame.

15254-----(recenter-top-bottom &optional ARG)
Move current buffer line to the specified window line.
With no prefix argument, successive calls place point according
to the cycling order defined by `recenter-positions'.

A prefix argument is handled like `recenter':
 With numeric prefix ARG, move current line to window-line ARG.
 With plain `C-u', move current line to window center.

15254-----(modify-syntax-entry CHAR NEWENTRY &optional SYNTAX-TABLE)
Set syntax for character CHAR according to string NEWENTRY.
The syntax is changed only for table SYNTAX-TABLE, which defaults to
 the current buffer's syntax table.
CHAR may be a cons (MIN . MAX), in which case, syntaxes of all characters
in the range MIN to MAX are changed.
The first character of NEWENTRY should be one of the following:
  Space or -  whitespace syntax.    w   word constituent.
  _           symbol constituent.   .   punctuation.
  (           open-parenthesis.     )   close-parenthesis.
  "           string quote.         \   escape.
  $           paired delimiter.     \='   expression quote or prefix operator.
  <           comment starter.      >   comment ender.
  /           character-quote.      @   inherit from parent table.
  |           generic string fence. !   generic comment fence.

Only single-character comment start and end sequences are represented thus.
Two-character sequences are represented as described below.
The second character of NEWENTRY is the matching parenthesis,
 used only if the first character is `(' or `)'.
Any additional characters are flags.
Defined flags are the characters 1, 2, 3, 4, b, p, and n.
 1 means CHAR is the start of a two-char comment start sequence.
 2 means CHAR is the second character of such a sequence.
 3 means CHAR is the start of a two-char comment end sequence.
 4 means CHAR is the second character of such a sequence.

There can be several orthogonal comment sequences.  This is to support
language modes such as C++.  By default, all comment sequences are of style
a, but you can set the comment sequence style to b (on the second character
of a comment-start, and the first character of a comment-end sequence) and/or
c (on any of its chars) using this flag:
 b means CHAR is part of comment sequence b.
 c means CHAR is part of comment sequence c.
 n means CHAR is part of a nestable comment sequence.

 p means CHAR is a prefix character for `backward-prefix-chars';
   such characters are treated as whitespace when they occur
   between expressions.

15254-----(describe-syntax &optional BUFFER)
Describe the syntax specifications in the syntax table of BUFFER.
The descriptions are inserted in a help buffer, which is then displayed.
BUFFER defaults to the current buffer.

15254-----(re-search-forward REGEXP &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search forward from point for regular expression REGEXP.
Set point to the end of the occurrence found, and return point.
The optional second argument BOUND is a buffer position that bounds
  the search.  The match found must not end after that position.  A
  value of nil means search to the end of the accessible portion of
  the buffer.
The optional third argument NOERROR indicates how errors are handled
  when the search fails.  If it is nil or omitted, emit an error; if
  it is t, simply return nil and do nothing; if it is neither nil nor
  t, move to the limit of search and return nil.
The optional fourth argument COUNT is a number that indicates the
  search direction and the number of occurrences to search for.  If it
  is positive, search forward for COUNT successive occurrences; if it
  is negative, search backward, instead of forward, for -COUNT
  occurrences.  A value of nil means the same as 1.
With COUNT positive/negative, the match found is the COUNTth/-COUNTth
  one in the buffer located entirely after/before the origin of the
  search.

Search case-sensitivity is determined by the value of the variable
`case-fold-search', which see.

See also the functions `match-beginning', `match-end', `match-string',
and `replace-match'.

15254-----(re-search-backward REGEXP &optional BOUND NOERROR COUNT)
Search backward from point for regular expression REGEXP.
This function is almost identical to `re-search-forward', except that
by default it searches backward instead of forward, and the sign of
COUNT also indicates exactly the opposite searching direction.
See `re-search-forward' for details.

Note that searching backwards may give a shorter match than expected,
because REGEXP is still matched in the forward direction.  See Info
anchor `(elisp) re-search-backward' for details.

15254-----(emacs-uptime &optional FORMAT)
Return a string giving the uptime of this instance of Emacs.
FORMAT is a string to format the result, using `format-seconds'.
For example, the Unix uptime command format is "%D, %z%2h:%.2m".

15254-----(emacs-init-time)
Return a string giving the duration of the Emacs initialization.

15254-----(delete-horizontal-space &optional BACKWARD-ONLY)
Delete all spaces and tabs around point.
If BACKWARD-ONLY is non-nil, only delete them before point.

15254-----(delete-indentation &optional ARG)
Join this line to previous and fix up whitespace at join.
If there is a fill prefix, delete it from the beginning of this line.
With argument, join this line to following line.

15254-----fixup-whitespace
Fixup white space between objects around point.
Leave one space or none, according to the context.(just-one-space &optional N)
Delete all spaces and tabs around point, leaving one space (or N spaces).
If N is negative, delete newlines as well, leaving -N spaces.
See also `cycle-spacing'.

15254-----delete-blank-lines
On blank line, delete all surrounding blank lines, leaving just one.
On isolated blank line, delete that one.
On nonblank line, delete any immediately following blank lines.(delete-trailing-whitespace &optional START END)
Delete trailing whitespace between START and END.
If called interactively, START and END are the start/end of the
region if the mark is active, or of the buffer's accessible
portion if the mark is inactive.

This command deletes whitespace characters after the last
non-whitespace character in each line between START and END.  It
does not consider formfeed characters to be whitespace.

If this command acts on the entire buffer (i.e. if called
interactively with the mark inactive, or called from Lisp with
END nil), it also deletes all trailing lines at the end of the
buffer if the variable `delete-trailing-lines' is non-nil.

15254-----(debug &rest ARGS)
Enter debugger.  \<debugger-mode-map>`\[debugger-continue]' returns from the debugger.
Arguments are mainly for use when this is called from the internals
of the evaluator.

You may call with no args, or you may pass nil as the first arg and
any other args you like.  In that case, the list of args after the
first will be printed into the backtrace buffer.

15254-----(scroll-left &optional ARG SET-MINIMUM)
Scroll selected window display ARG columns left.
Default for ARG is window width minus 2.
Value is the total amount of leftward horizontal scrolling in
effect after the change.
If SET-MINIMUM is non-nil, the new scroll amount becomes the
lower bound for automatic scrolling, i.e. automatic scrolling
will not scroll a window to a column less than the value returned
by this function.  This happens in an interactive call.

15254-----(scroll-right &optional ARG SET-MINIMUM)
Scroll selected window display ARG columns right.
Default for ARG is window width minus 2.
Value is the total amount of leftward horizontal scrolling in
effect after the change.
If SET-MINIMUM is non-nil, the new scroll amount becomes the
lower bound for automatic scrolling, i.e. automatic scrolling
will not scroll a window to a column less than the value returned
by this function.  This happens in an interactive call.

15254-----blink-matching-open
Momentarily highlight the beginning of the sexp before point.(global-set-key KEY COMMAND)
Give KEY a global binding as COMMAND.
COMMAND is the command definition to use; usually it is
a symbol naming an interactively-callable function.
KEY is a key sequence; noninteractively, it is a string or vector
of characters or event types, and non-ASCII characters with codes
above 127 (such as ISO Latin-1) can be included if you use a vector.

Note that if KEY has a local binding in the current buffer,
that local binding will continue to shadow any global binding
that you make with this function.

15254-----(global-unset-key KEY)
Remove global binding of KEY.
KEY is a string or vector representing a sequence of keystrokes.

15254-----(local-set-key KEY COMMAND)
Give KEY a local binding as COMMAND.
COMMAND is the command definition to use; usually it is
a symbol naming an interactively-callable function.
KEY is a key sequence; noninteractively, it is a string or vector
of characters or event types, and non-ASCII characters with codes
above 127 (such as ISO Latin-1) can be included if you use a vector.

The binding goes in the current buffer's local map, which in most
cases is shared with all other buffers in the same major mode.

15254-----(local-unset-key KEY)
Remove local binding of KEY.
KEY is a string or vector representing a sequence of keystrokes.

15254-----(raise-frame &optional FRAME)
Bring FRAME to the front, so it occludes any frames it overlaps.
If FRAME is invisible or iconified, make it visible.
If you don't specify a frame, the selected frame is used.
If Emacs is displaying on an ordinary terminal or some other device which
doesn't support multiple overlapping frames, this function selects FRAME.

15254-----(lower-frame &optional FRAME)
Send FRAME to the back, so it is occluded by any frames that overlap it.
If you don't specify a frame, the selected frame is used.
If Emacs is displaying on an ordinary terminal or some other device which
doesn't support multiple overlapping frames, this function does nothing.

15254-----(delete-frame &optional FRAME FORCE)
Delete FRAME, permanently eliminating it from use.
FRAME must be a live frame and defaults to the selected one.

A frame may not be deleted if its minibuffer serves as surrogate
minibuffer for another frame.  Normally, you may not delete a frame if
all other frames are invisible, but if the second optional argument
FORCE is non-nil, you may do so.

This function runs `delete-frame-functions' before actually
deleting the frame, unless the frame is a tooltip.
The functions are run with one argument, the frame to be deleted.

15254-----(fit-window-to-buffer &optional WINDOW MAX-HEIGHT MIN-HEIGHT MAX-WIDTH MIN-WIDTH PRESERVE-SIZE)
Adjust size of WINDOW to display its buffer's contents exactly.
WINDOW must be a live window and defaults to the selected one.

If WINDOW is part of a vertical combination, adjust WINDOW's
height.  The new height is calculated from the actual height of
the accessible portion of its buffer.  The optional argument
MAX-HEIGHT specifies a maximum height and defaults to the height
of WINDOW's frame.  The optional argument MIN-HEIGHT specifies a
minimum height and defaults to `window-min-height'.  Both
MAX-HEIGHT and MIN-HEIGHT are specified in lines and include mode
and header line and a bottom divider, if any.

If WINDOW is part of a horizontal combination and the value of
the option `fit-window-to-buffer-horizontally' is non-nil, adjust
WINDOW's width.  The new width of WINDOW is calculated from the
maximum length of its buffer's lines that follow the current
start position of WINDOW.  The optional argument MAX-WIDTH
specifies a maximum width and defaults to the width of WINDOW's
frame.  The optional argument MIN-WIDTH specifies a minimum width
and defaults to `window-min-width'.  Both MAX-WIDTH and MIN-WIDTH
are specified in columns and include fringes, margins, a
scrollbar and a vertical divider, if any.

If the optional argument `preserve-size' is non-nil, preserve the
size of WINDOW (see `window-preserve-size').

Fit pixelwise if the option `window-resize-pixelwise' is non-nil.
If WINDOW is its frame's root window and the option
`fit-frame-to-buffer' is non-nil, call `fit-frame-to-buffer' to
adjust the frame's size.

Note that even if this function makes WINDOW large enough to show
_all_ parts of its buffer you might not see the first part when
WINDOW was scrolled.  If WINDOW is resized horizontally, you will
not see the top of its buffer unless WINDOW starts at its minimum
accessible position.

15254-----(fit-frame-to-buffer &optional FRAME MAX-HEIGHT MIN-HEIGHT MAX-WIDTH MIN-WIDTH ONLY)
Adjust size of FRAME to display the contents of its buffer exactly.
FRAME can be any live frame and defaults to the selected one.
Fit only if FRAME's root window is live.  MAX-HEIGHT, MIN-HEIGHT,
MAX-WIDTH and MIN-WIDTH specify bounds on the new total size of
FRAME's root window.  MIN-HEIGHT and MIN-WIDTH default to the values of
`window-min-height' and `window-min-width' respectively.

If the optional argument ONLY is `vertically', resize the frame
vertically only.  If ONLY is `horizontally', resize the frame
horizontally only.

The new position and size of FRAME can be additionally determined
by customizing the options `fit-frame-to-buffer-sizes' and
`fit-frame-to-buffer-margins' or setting the corresponding
parameters of FRAME.

15254-----(shrink-window-if-larger-than-buffer &optional WINDOW)
Shrink height of WINDOW if its buffer doesn't need so many lines.
More precisely, shrink WINDOW vertically to be as small as
possible, while still showing the full contents of its buffer.
WINDOW must be a live window and defaults to the selected one.

Do not shrink WINDOW to less than `window-min-height' lines.  Do
nothing if the buffer contains more lines than the present window
height, or if some of the window's contents are scrolled out of
view, or if shrinking this window would also shrink another
window, or if the window is the only window of its frame.

Return non-nil if the window was shrunk, nil otherwise.

15254-----(balance-windows &optional WINDOW-OR-FRAME)
Balance the sizes of windows of WINDOW-OR-FRAME.
WINDOW-OR-FRAME is optional and defaults to the selected frame.
If WINDOW-OR-FRAME denotes a frame, balance the sizes of all
windows of that frame.  If WINDOW-OR-FRAME denotes a window,
recursively balance the sizes of all child windows of that
window.

15254-----balance-windows-area
Make all visible windows the same area (approximately).
See also `window-area-factor' to change the relative size of
specific buffers.(maximize-window &optional WINDOW)
Maximize WINDOW.
Make WINDOW as large as possible without deleting any windows.
WINDOW must be a valid window and defaults to the selected one.

If the option `window-resize-pixelwise' is non-nil maximize
WINDOW pixelwise.

15254-----(minimize-window &optional WINDOW)
Minimize WINDOW.
Make WINDOW as small as possible without deleting any windows.
WINDOW must be a valid window and defaults to the selected one.

If the option `window-resize-pixelwise' is non-nil minimize
WINDOW pixelwise.

15254-----delete-minibuffer-contents
Delete all user input in a minibuffer.
If the current buffer is not a minibuffer, erase its entire contents.(open-termscript FILE)
Start writing all terminal output to FILE as well as the terminal.
FILE = nil means just close any termscript file currently open.

15254-----(erase-buffer)
Delete the entire contents of the current buffer.
Any narrowing restriction in effect (see `narrow-to-region') is removed,
so the buffer is truly empty after this.

15254-----(delete-region START END)
Delete the text between START and END.
If called interactively, delete the region between point and mark.
This command deletes buffer text without modifying the kill ring.

15254-----(delete-char N &optional KILLFLAG)
Delete the following N characters (previous if N is negative).
Optional second arg KILLFLAG non-nil means kill instead (save in kill ring).
Interactively, N is the prefix arg, and KILLFLAG is set if
N was explicitly specified.

The command `delete-forward-char' is preferable for interactive use, e.g.
because it respects values of `delete-active-region' and `overwrite-mode'.

15254-----(delete-backward-char N &optional KILLFLAG)
Delete the previous N characters (following if N is negative).
If Transient Mark mode is enabled, the mark is active, and N is 1,
delete the text in the region and deactivate the mark instead.
To disable this, set option `delete-active-region' to nil.

Optional second arg KILLFLAG, if non-nil, means to kill (save in
kill ring) instead of delete.  Interactively, N is the prefix
arg, and KILLFLAG is set if N is explicitly specified.

When killing, the killed text is filtered by
`filter-buffer-substring' before it is saved in the kill ring, so
the actual saved text might be different from what was killed.

In Overwrite mode, single character backward deletion may replace
tabs with spaces so as to back over columns, unless point is at
the end of the line.

15254-----(backward-delete-char-untabify ARG &optional KILLP)
Delete characters backward, changing tabs into spaces.
The exact behavior depends on `backward-delete-char-untabify-method'.
Delete ARG chars, and kill (save in kill ring) if KILLP is non-nil.
Interactively, ARG is the prefix arg (default 1)
and KILLP is t if a prefix arg was specified.

15254-----(capitalize-region BEG END)
Convert the region to capitalized form.
This means that each word's first character is converted to either
title case or upper case, and the rest to lower case.
In programs, give two arguments, the starting and ending
character positions to operate on.

15254-----(downcase-region BEG END &optional REGION-NONCONTIGUOUS-P)
Convert the region to lower case.  In programs, wants two arguments.
These arguments specify the starting and ending character numbers of
the region to operate on.  When used as a command, the text between
point and the mark is operated on.

15254-----(upcase-region BEG END &optional REGION-NONCONTIGUOUS-P)
Convert the region to upper case.  In programs, wants two arguments.
These arguments specify the starting and ending character numbers of
the region to operate on.  When used as a command, the text between
point and the mark is operated on.
See also `capitalize-region'.

15254-----(capitalize-word ARG)
Capitalize from point to the end of word, moving over.
With numerical argument ARG, capitalize the next ARG-1 words as well.
This gives the word(s) a first character in upper case
and the rest lower case.

If point is in the middle of a word, the part of that word before point
is ignored when moving forward.

With negative argument, capitalize previous words but do not move.

15254-----(downcase-word ARG)
Convert to lower case from point to end of word, moving over.

If point is in the middle of a word, the part of that word before point
is ignored when moving forward.

With negative argument, convert previous words but do not move.

15254-----(upcase-word ARG)
Convert to upper case from point to end of word, moving over.

If point is in the middle of a word, the part of that word before point
is ignored when moving forward.

With negative argument, convert previous words but do not move.
See also `capitalize-word'.

15254-----(bury-buffer &optional BUFFER-OR-NAME)
Put BUFFER-OR-NAME at the end of the list of all buffers.
There it is the least likely candidate for `other-buffer' to
return; thus, the least likely buffer for \[switch-to-buffer] to
select by default.

You can specify a buffer name as BUFFER-OR-NAME, or an actual
buffer object.  If BUFFER-OR-NAME is nil or omitted, bury the
current buffer.  Also, if BUFFER-OR-NAME is nil or omitted,
remove the current buffer from the selected window if it is
displayed there.

15254-----unbury-buffer
Switch to the last buffer in the buffer list.(make-frame &optional PARAMETERS)
Return a newly created frame displaying the current buffer.
Optional argument PARAMETERS is an alist of frame parameters for
the new frame.  Each element of PARAMETERS should have the
form (NAME . VALUE), for example:

 (name . STRING)	The frame should be named STRING.

 (width . NUMBER)	The frame should be NUMBER characters in width.
 (height . NUMBER)	The frame should be NUMBER text lines high.

 (minibuffer . t)	The frame should have a minibuffer.
 (minibuffer . nil)	The frame should have no minibuffer.
 (minibuffer . only)	The frame should contain only a minibuffer.
 (minibuffer . WINDOW)	The frame should use WINDOW as its minibuffer window.

 (window-system . nil)	The frame should be displayed on a terminal device.
 (window-system . x)	The frame should be displayed in an X window.

 (display . ":0")     The frame should appear on display :0.

 (terminal . TERMINAL)  The frame should use the terminal object TERMINAL.

In addition, any parameter specified in `default-frame-alist',
but not present in PARAMETERS, is applied.

Before creating the frame (via `frame-creation-function'), this
function runs the hook `before-make-frame-hook'.  After creating
the frame, it runs the hook `after-make-frame-functions' with one
argument, the newly created frame.

If a display parameter is supplied and a window-system is not,
guess the window-system from the display.

On graphical displays, this function does not itself make the new
frame the selected frame.  However, the window system may select
the new frame according to its own rules.

15254-----(view-register REGISTER)
Display what is contained in register named REGISTER.
The Lisp value REGISTER is a character.

Interactively, reads the register using `register-read-with-preview'.

15254-----(insert-register REGISTER &optional ARG)
Insert contents of register REGISTER.  (REGISTER is a character.)
Normally puts point before and mark after the inserted text.
If optional second arg is non-nil, puts mark before and point after.
Interactively, second arg is nil if prefix arg is supplied and t
otherwise.

Interactively, reads the register using `register-read-with-preview'.

15254-----(kill-region BEG END &optional REGION)
Kill ("cut") text between point and mark.
This deletes the text from the buffer and saves it in the kill ring.
The command \[yank] can retrieve it from there.
(If you want to save the region without killing it, use \[kill-ring-save].)

If you want to append the killed region to the last killed text,
use \[append-next-kill] before \[kill-region].

Any command that calls this function is a "kill command".
If the previous command was also a kill command,
the text killed this time appends to the text killed last time
to make one entry in the kill ring.

The killed text is filtered by `filter-buffer-substring' before it is
saved in the kill ring, so the actual saved text might be different
from what was killed.

If the buffer is read-only, Emacs will beep and refrain from deleting
the text, but put the text in the kill ring anyway.  This means that
you can use the killing commands to copy text from a read-only buffer.

Lisp programs should use this function for killing text.
 (To delete text, use `delete-region'.)
Supply two arguments, character positions BEG and END indicating the
 stretch of text to be killed.  If the optional argument REGION is
 non-nil, the function ignores BEG and END, and kills the current
 region instead.

15254-----(copy-region-as-kill BEG END &optional REGION)
Save the region as if killed, but don't kill it.
In Transient Mark mode, deactivate the mark.
If `interprogram-cut-function' is non-nil, also save the text for a window
system cut and paste.

The copied text is filtered by `filter-buffer-substring' before it is
saved in the kill ring, so the actual saved text might be different
from what was in the buffer.

When called from Lisp, save in the kill ring the stretch of text
between BEG and END, unless the optional argument REGION is
non-nil, in which case ignore BEG and END, and save the current
region instead.

This command's old key binding has been given to `kill-ring-save'.

15254-----expand-abbrev
Expand the abbrev before point, if there is an abbrev there.
Effective when explicitly called even when `abbrev-mode' is nil.
Before doing anything else, runs `pre-abbrev-expand-hook'.
Calls the value of `abbrev-expand-function' with no argument to do
the work, and returns whatever it does.  (That return value should
be the abbrev symbol if expansion occurred, else nil.)(abbrev-prefix-mark &optional ARG)
Mark current point as the beginning of an abbrev.
Abbrev to be expanded starts here rather than at beginning of word.
This way, you can expand an abbrev with a prefix: insert the prefix,
use this command, then insert the abbrev.  This command inserts a
temporary hyphen after the prefix (until the intended abbrev
expansion occurs).
If the prefix is itself an abbrev, this command expands it, unless
ARG is non-nil.  Interactively, ARG is the prefix argument.

15254-----(set-frame-font FONT &optional KEEP-SIZE FRAMES)
Set the default font to FONT.
When called interactively, prompt for the name of a font, and use
that font on the selected frame.  When called from Lisp, FONT
should be a font name (a string), a font object, font entity, or
font spec.

If KEEP-SIZE is nil, keep the number of frame lines and columns
fixed.  If KEEP-SIZE is non-nil (or with a prefix argument), try
to keep the current frame size fixed (in pixels) by adjusting the
number of lines and columns.

If FRAMES is nil, apply the font to the selected frame only.
If FRAMES is non-nil, it should be a list of frames to act upon,
or t meaning all existing graphical frames.
Also, if FRAMES is non-nil, alter the user's Customization settings
as though the font-related attributes of the `default' face had been
"set in this session", so that the font is applied to future frames.

15254-----(list-charset-chars CHARSET)
Display a list of characters in character set CHARSET.

15254-----(make-indirect-buffer BASE-BUFFER NAME &optional CLONE)
Create and return an indirect buffer for buffer BASE-BUFFER, named NAME.
BASE-BUFFER should be a live buffer, or the name of an existing buffer.
NAME should be a string which is not the name of an existing buffer.
Optional argument CLONE non-nil means preserve BASE-BUFFER's state,
such as major and minor modes, in the indirect buffer.
CLONE nil means the indirect buffer's state is reset to default values.

15254-----(clone-indirect-buffer NEWNAME DISPLAY-FLAG &optional NORECORD)
Create an indirect buffer that is a twin copy of the current buffer.

Give the indirect buffer name NEWNAME.  Interactively, read NEWNAME
from the minibuffer when invoked with a prefix arg.  If NEWNAME is nil
or if not called with a prefix arg, NEWNAME defaults to the current
buffer's name.  The name is modified by adding a `<N>' suffix to it
or by incrementing the N in an existing suffix.  Trying to clone a
buffer whose major mode symbol has a non-nil `no-clone-indirect'
property results in an error.

DISPLAY-FLAG non-nil means show the new buffer with `pop-to-buffer'.
This is always done when called interactively.

Optional third arg NORECORD non-nil means do not put this buffer at the
front of the list of recently selected ones.

Returns the newly created indirect buffer.

15254-----(make-directory DIR &optional PARENTS)
Create the directory DIR and optionally any nonexistent parent dirs.
If DIR already exists as a directory, signal an error, unless
PARENTS is non-nil.

Interactively, the default choice of directory to create is the
current buffer's default directory.  That is useful when you have
visited a file in a nonexistent directory.

Noninteractively, the second (optional) argument PARENTS, if
non-nil, says whether to create parent directories that don't
exist.  Interactively, this happens by default.

If creating the directory or directories fail, an error will be
raised.

15254-----(copy-directory DIRECTORY NEWNAME &optional KEEP-TIME PARENTS COPY-CONTENTS)
Copy DIRECTORY to NEWNAME.  Both args must be strings.
This function always sets the file modes of the output files to match
the corresponding input file.

The third arg KEEP-TIME non-nil means give the output files the same
last-modified time as the old ones.  (This works on only some systems.)

A prefix arg makes KEEP-TIME non-nil.

Noninteractively, the last argument PARENTS says whether to
create parent directories if they don't exist.  Interactively,
this happens by default.

If NEWNAME is a directory name, copy DIRECTORY as a subdirectory
there.  However, if called from Lisp with a non-nil optional
argument COPY-CONTENTS, copy the contents of DIRECTORY directly
into NEWNAME instead.

15254-----(delete-directory DIRECTORY &optional RECURSIVE TRASH)
Delete the directory named DIRECTORY.  Does not follow symlinks.
If RECURSIVE is non-nil, delete files in DIRECTORY as well, with
no error if something else is simultaneously deleting them.
TRASH non-nil means to trash the directory instead, provided
`delete-by-moving-to-trash' is non-nil.

When called interactively, TRASH is nil if and only if a prefix
argument is given, and a further prompt asks the user for
RECURSIVE if DIRECTORY is nonempty.

15254-----(locate-library LIBRARY &optional NOSUFFIX PATH INTERACTIVE-CALL)
Show the precise file name of Emacs library LIBRARY.
LIBRARY should be a relative file name of the library, a string.
It can omit the suffix (a.k.a. file-name extension) if NOSUFFIX is
nil (which is the default, see below).
This command searches the directories in `load-path' like `\[load-library]'
to find the file that `\[load-library] RET LIBRARY RET' would load.
Optional second arg NOSUFFIX non-nil means don't add suffixes `load-suffixes'
to the specified name LIBRARY.

If the optional third arg PATH is specified, that list of directories
is used instead of `load-path'.

When called from a program, the file name is normally returned as a
string.  When run interactively, the argument INTERACTIVE-CALL is t,
and the file name is displayed in the echo area.

15254-----(list-load-path-shadows &optional STRINGP)
Display a list of Emacs Lisp files that shadow other files.

If STRINGP is non-nil, returns any shadows as a string.
Otherwise, if interactive shows any shadows in a `*Shadows*' buffer;
else prints messages listing any shadows.

This function lists potential load path problems.  Directories in
the `load-path' variable are searched, in order, for Emacs Lisp
files.  When a previously encountered file name is found again, a
message is displayed indicating that the later file is "hidden" by
the earlier.

For example, suppose `load-path' is set to

("/usr/share/emacs/site-lisp" "/usr/share/emacs/24.3/lisp")

and that each of these directories contains a file called XXX.el.  Then
XXX.el in the site-lisp directory is referred to by all of:
(require \='XXX), (autoload .... "XXX"), (load-library "XXX") etc.

The first XXX.el file prevents Emacs from seeing the second (unless
the second is loaded explicitly via `load-file').

When not intended, such shadowings can be the source of subtle
problems.  For example, the above situation may have arisen because the
XXX package was not distributed with versions of Emacs prior to
24.3.  A system administrator downloaded XXX from elsewhere and installed
it.  Later, XXX was updated and included in the Emacs distribution.
Unless the system administrator checks for this, the new version of XXX
will be hidden behind the old (which may no longer work with the new
Emacs version).

This function performs these checks and flags all possible
shadowings.  Because a .el file may exist without a corresponding .elc
(or vice-versa), these suffixes are essentially ignored.  A file
XXX.elc in an early directory (that does not contain XXX.el) is
considered to shadow a later file XXX.el, and vice-versa.

Shadowings are located by calling the (non-interactive) companion
function, `load-path-shadows-find'.

15254-----tab-to-tab-stop
Insert spaces or tabs to next defined tab-stop column.
The variable `tab-stop-list' is a list of columns at which there are tab stops.
Use \[edit-tab-stops] to edit them interactively.(kill-buffer &optional BUFFER-OR-NAME)
Kill the buffer specified by BUFFER-OR-NAME.
The argument may be a buffer or the name of an existing buffer.
Argument nil or omitted means kill the current buffer.  Return t if the
buffer is actually killed, nil otherwise.

The functions in `kill-buffer-query-functions' are called with the
buffer to be killed as the current buffer.  If any of them returns nil,
the buffer is not killed.  The hook `kill-buffer-hook' is run before the
buffer is actually killed.  The buffer being killed will be current
while the hook is running.  Functions called by any of these hooks are
supposed to not change the current buffer.

Any processes that have this buffer as the `process-buffer' are killed
with SIGHUP.  This function calls `replace-buffer-in-windows' for
cleaning up all windows currently displaying the buffer to be killed.

15254-----back-to-indentation
Move point to the first non-whitespace character on this line.(backward-to-indentation &optional ARG)
Move backward ARG lines and position at first nonblank character.

15254-----(forward-to-indentation &optional ARG)
Move forward ARG lines and position at first nonblank character.

15254-----(unload-feature FEATURE &optional FORCE)
Unload the library that provided FEATURE.
If the feature is required by any other loaded code, and prefix arg FORCE
is nil, raise an error.

Standard unloading activities include restoring old autoloads for
functions defined by the library, undoing any additions that the
library has made to hook variables or to `auto-mode-alist', undoing
ELP profiling of functions in that library, unproviding any features
provided by the library, and canceling timers held in variables
defined by the library.

If a function `FEATURE-unload-function' is defined, this function
calls it with no arguments, before doing anything else.  That function
can do whatever is appropriate to undo the loading of the library.  If
`FEATURE-unload-function' returns non-nil, that suppresses the
standard unloading of the library.  Otherwise the standard unloading
proceeds.

`FEATURE-unload-function' has access to the package's list of
definitions in the variable `unload-function-defs-list' and could
remove symbols from it in the event that the package has done
something strange, such as redefining an Emacs function.

15254-----read-kbd-macro
Read the region as a keyboard macro definition.
The region is interpreted as spelled-out keystrokes, e.g., "M-x abc RET".
See documentation for `edmacro-mode' for details.
Leading/trailing "C-x (" and "C-x )" in the text are allowed and ignored.
The resulting macro is installed as the "current" keyboard macro.

In Lisp, may also be called with a single STRING argument in which case
the result is returned rather than being installed as the current macro.
The result will be a string if possible, otherwise an event vector.
Second argument NEED-VECTOR means to return an event vector always.(serial-term PORT SPEED)
Start a terminal-emulator for a serial port in a new buffer.
PORT is the path or name of the serial port.  For example, this
could be "/dev/ttyS0" on Unix.  On Windows, this could be
"COM1" or "\\.\COM10".
SPEED is the speed of the serial port in bits per second.  9600
is a common value.  SPEED can be nil, see
`serial-process-configure' for details.
The buffer is in Term mode; see `term-mode' for the commands to
use in that buffer.
\<term-raw-map>Type \[switch-to-buffer] to switch to another buffer.

15254-----(buffer-enable-undo &optional BUFFER)
Start keeping undo information for buffer BUFFER.
No argument or nil as argument means do this for the current buffer.

15254-----(buffer-disable-undo &optional BUFFER)
Make BUFFER stop keeping undo information.
No argument or nil as argument means do this for the current buffer.

15254-----text-mode
Major mode for editing text written for humans to read.
In this mode, paragraphs are delimited only by blank or white lines.
You can thus get the full benefit of adaptive filling
 (see the variable `adaptive-fill-mode').
\{text-mode-map}
Turning on Text mode runs the normal hook `text-mode-hook'.prog-mode
Major mode for editing programming language source code.

This mode runs the hook `prog-mode-hook', as the final or penultimate step
during initialization.

\{prog-mode-map}special-mode
Parent major mode from which special major modes should inherit.

This mode runs the hook `special-mode-hook', as the final or penultimate step
during initialization.

\{special-mode-map}(beginning-of-buffer &optional ARG)
Move point to the beginning of the buffer.
With numeric arg N, put point N/10 of the way from the beginning.
If the buffer is narrowed, this command uses the beginning of the
accessible part of the buffer.

Push mark at previous position, unless either a \[universal-argument] prefix
is supplied, or Transient Mark mode is enabled and the mark is active.

15254-----(end-of-buffer &optional ARG)
Move point to the end of the buffer.
With numeric arg N, put point N/10 of the way from the end.
If the buffer is narrowed, this command uses the end of the
accessible part of the buffer.

Push mark at previous position, unless either a \[universal-argument] prefix
is supplied, or Transient Mark mode is enabled and the mark is active.

15254-----(forward-list &optional ARG)
Move forward across one balanced group of parentheses.
This command will also work on other parentheses-like expressions
defined by the current language mode.
With ARG, do it that many times.
Negative arg -N means move backward across N groups of parentheses.
This command assumes point is not in a string or comment.

15254-----(backward-list &optional ARG)
Move backward across one balanced group of parentheses.
This command will also work on other parentheses-like expressions
defined by the current language mode.
With ARG, do it that many times.
Negative arg -N means move forward across N groups of parentheses.
This command assumes point is not in a string or comment.

15254-----(up-list &optional ARG ESCAPE-STRINGS NO-SYNTAX-CROSSING)
Move forward out of one level of parentheses.
This command will also work on other parentheses-like expressions
defined by the current language mode.  With ARG, do this that
many times.  A negative argument means move backward but still to
a less deep spot.  If ESCAPE-STRINGS is non-nil (as it is
interactively), move out of enclosing strings as well. If
NO-SYNTAX-CROSSING is non-nil (as it is interactively), prefer to
break out of any enclosing string instead of moving to the start
of a list broken across multiple strings.  On error, location of
point is unspecified.

15254-----(backward-up-list &optional ARG ESCAPE-STRINGS NO-SYNTAX-CROSSING)
Move backward out of one level of parentheses.
This command will also work on other parentheses-like expressions
defined by the current language mode.  With ARG, do this that
many times.  A negative argument means move forward but still to
a less deep spot.  If ESCAPE-STRINGS is non-nil (as it is
interactively), move out of enclosing strings as well.  If
NO-SYNTAX-CROSSING is non-nil (as it is interactively), prefer to
break out of any enclosing string instead of moving to the start
of a list broken across multiple strings.  On error, location of
point is unspecified.

15254-----(down-list &optional ARG)
Move forward down one level of parentheses.
This command will also work on other parentheses-like expressions
defined by the current language mode.
With ARG, do this that many times.
A negative argument means move backward but still go down a level.
This command assumes point is not in a string or comment.

15254-----(forward-sexp &optional ARG)
Move forward across one balanced expression (sexp).
With ARG, do it that many times.  Negative arg -N means move
backward across N balanced expressions.  This command assumes
point is not in a string or comment.  Calls
`forward-sexp-function' to do the work, if that is non-nil.  If
unable to move over a sexp, signal `scan-error' with three
arguments: a message, the start of the obstacle (usually a
parenthesis or list marker of some kind), and end of the
obstacle.

15254-----(backward-sexp &optional ARG)
Move backward across one balanced expression (sexp).
With ARG, do it that many times.  Negative arg -N means
move forward across N balanced expressions.
This command assumes point is not in a string or comment.
Uses `forward-sexp' to do the work.

15254-----(beginning-of-defun &optional ARG)
Move backward to the beginning of a defun.
With ARG, do it that many times.  Negative ARG means move forward
to the ARGth following beginning of defun.

If search is successful, return t; point ends up at the beginning
of the line where the search succeeded.  Otherwise, return nil.

When `open-paren-in-column-0-is-defun-start' is non-nil, a defun
is assumed to start where there is a char with open-parenthesis
syntax at the beginning of a line.  If `defun-prompt-regexp' is
non-nil, then a string which matches that regexp may also precede
the open-parenthesis.  If `defun-prompt-regexp' and
`open-paren-in-column-0-is-defun-start' are both nil, this
function instead finds an open-paren at the outermost level.

If the variable `beginning-of-defun-function' is non-nil, its
value is called as a function, with argument ARG, to find the
defun's beginning.

Regardless of the values of `defun-prompt-regexp' and
`beginning-of-defun-function', point always moves to the
beginning of the line whenever the search is successful.

15254-----(end-of-defun &optional ARG)
Move forward to next end of defun.
With argument, do it that many times.
Negative argument -N means move back to Nth preceding end of defun.

An end of a defun occurs right after the close-parenthesis that
matches the open-parenthesis that starts a defun; see function
`beginning-of-defun'.

If variable `end-of-defun-function' is non-nil, its value
is called as a function to find the defun's end.

15254-----(gui-set-selection TYPE DATA)
Make an X selection of type TYPE and value DATA.
The argument TYPE (nil means `PRIMARY') says which selection, and
DATA specifies the contents.  TYPE must be a symbol.  (It can also
be a string, which stands for the symbol with that name, but this
is considered obsolete.)  DATA may be a string, a symbol, an
integer (or a cons of two integers or list of two integers).

The selection may also be a cons of two markers pointing to the same buffer,
or an overlay.  In these cases, the selection is considered to be the text
between the markers *at whatever time the selection is examined*.
Thus, editing done in the buffer after you specify the selection
can alter the effective value of the selection.

The data may also be a vector of valid non-vector selection values.

The return value is DATA.

Interactively, this command sets the primary selection.  Without
prefix argument, it reads the selection in the minibuffer.  With
prefix argument, it uses the text of the region as the selection value.

Note that on MS-Windows, primary and secondary selections set by Emacs
are not available to other programs.

15254-----undefined
Beep to tell the user this binding is undefined.(garbage-collect)
Reclaim storage for Lisp objects no longer needed.
Garbage collection happens automatically if you cons more than
`gc-cons-threshold' bytes of Lisp data since previous garbage collection.
`garbage-collect' normally returns a list with info on amount of space in use,
where each entry has the form (NAME SIZE USED FREE), where:
- NAME is a symbol describing the kind of objects this entry represents,
- SIZE is the number of bytes used by each one,
- USED is the number of those objects that were found live in the heap,
- FREE is the number of those objects that are not live but that Emacs
  keeps around for future allocations (maybe because it does not know how
  to return them to the OS).
However, if there was overflow in pure space, `garbage-collect'
returns nil, because real GC can't be done.
See Info node `(elisp)Garbage Collection'.

15254-----(describe-categories &optional BUFFER)
Describe the category specifications in the current category table.
The descriptions are inserted in a buffer, which is then displayed.
If BUFFER is non-nil, then describe BUFFER's category table instead.
BUFFER should be a buffer or a buffer name.

15254-----load-theme
Load Custom theme named THEME from its file.
The theme file is named THEME-theme.el, in one of the directories
specified by `custom-theme-load-path'.

If the theme is not considered safe by `custom-safe-themes',
prompt the user for confirmation before loading it.  But if
optional arg NO-CONFIRM is non-nil, load the theme without
prompting.

Normally, this function also enables THEME.  If optional arg
NO-ENABLE is non-nil, load the theme but don't enable it, unless
the theme was already enabled.

This function is normally called through Customize when setting
`custom-enabled-themes'.  If used directly in your init file, it
should be called with a non-nil NO-CONFIRM argument, or after
`custom-safe-themes' has been loaded.

Return t if THEME was successfully loaded, nil otherwise.enable-theme
Reenable all variable and face settings defined by THEME.
THEME should be either `user', or a theme loaded via `load-theme'.
After this function completes, THEME will have the highest
precedence (after `user').disable-theme
Disable all variable and face settings defined by THEME.
See `custom-enabled-themes' for a list of enabled themes.(not-modified &optional ARG)
Mark current buffer as unmodified, not needing to be saved.
With prefix ARG, mark buffer as modified, so \[save-buffer] will save.

It is not a good idea to use this function in Lisp programs, because it
prints a message in the minibuffer.  Instead, use `set-buffer-modified-p'.

15254-----(yank &optional ARG)
Reinsert ("paste") the last stretch of killed text.
More precisely, reinsert the most recent kill, which is the
stretch of killed text most recently killed OR yanked.  Put point
at the end, and set mark at the beginning without activating it.
With just \[universal-argument] as argument, put point at beginning, and mark at end.
With argument N, reinsert the Nth most recent kill.

This command honors the `yank-handled-properties' and
`yank-excluded-properties' variables, and the `yank-handler' text
property, as described below.

Properties listed in `yank-handled-properties' are processed,
then those listed in `yank-excluded-properties' are discarded.

If STRING has a non-nil `yank-handler' property anywhere, the
normal insert behavior is altered, and instead, for each contiguous
segment of STRING that has a given value of the `yank-handler'
property, that value is used as follows:

The value of a `yank-handler' property must be a list of one to four
elements, of the form (FUNCTION PARAM NOEXCLUDE UNDO).
FUNCTION, if non-nil, should be a function of one argument (the
 object to insert); FUNCTION is called instead of `insert'.
PARAM, if present and non-nil, is passed to FUNCTION (to be handled
 in whatever way is appropriate; e.g. if FUNCTION is `yank-rectangle',
 PARAM may be a list of strings to insert as a rectangle).  If PARAM
 is nil, then the current segment of STRING is used.
If NOEXCLUDE is present and non-nil, the normal removal of
 `yank-excluded-properties' is not performed; instead FUNCTION is
 responsible for the removal.  This may be necessary if FUNCTION
 adjusts point before or after inserting the object.
UNDO, if present and non-nil, should be a function to be called
 by `yank-pop' to undo the insertion of the current PARAM.  It is
 given two arguments, the start and end of the region.  FUNCTION
 may set `yank-undo-function' to override UNDO.

See also the command `yank-pop' (\[yank-pop]).

15254-----(yank-pop &optional ARG)
Replace just-yanked stretch of killed text with a different stretch.
This command is allowed only immediately after a `yank' or a `yank-pop'.
At such a time, the region contains a stretch of reinserted
previously-killed text.  `yank-pop' deletes that text and inserts in its
place a different stretch of killed text.

With no argument, the previous kill is inserted.
With argument N, insert the Nth previous kill.
If N is negative, this is a more recent kill.

The sequence of kills wraps around, so that after the oldest one
comes the newest one.

This command honors the `yank-handled-properties' and
`yank-excluded-properties' variables, and the `yank-handler' text
property, in the way that `yank' does.

15254-----(split-window-right &optional SIZE)
Split the selected window into two side-by-side windows.
The selected window is on the left.  The newly split-off window
is on the right and displays the same buffer.  Return the new
window.

If optional argument SIZE is omitted or nil, both windows get the
same width, or close to it.  If SIZE is positive, the left-hand
(selected) window gets SIZE columns.  If SIZE is negative, the
right-hand (new) window gets -SIZE columns.  Here, SIZE includes
the width of the window's scroll bar; if there are no scroll
bars, it includes the width of the divider column to the window's
right, if any.

15254-----(split-window-below &optional SIZE)
Split the selected window into two windows, one above the other.
The selected window is above.  The newly split-off window is
below and displays the same buffer.  Return the new window.

If optional argument SIZE is omitted or nil, both windows get the
same height, or close to it.  If SIZE is positive, the upper
(selected) window gets SIZE lines.  If SIZE is negative, the
lower (new) window gets -SIZE lines.

If the variable `split-window-keep-point' is non-nil, both
windows get the same value of point as the selected window.
Otherwise, the window starts are chosen so as to minimize the
amount of redisplay; this is convenient on slow terminals.

15254-----(set-visited-file-name FILENAME &optional NO-QUERY ALONG-WITH-FILE)
Change name of file visited in current buffer to FILENAME.
This also renames the buffer to correspond to the new file.
The next time the buffer is saved it will go in the newly specified file.
FILENAME nil or an empty string means mark buffer as not visiting any file.
Remember to delete the initial contents of the minibuffer
if you wish to pass an empty string as the argument.

The optional second argument NO-QUERY, if non-nil, inhibits asking for
confirmation in the case where another buffer is already visiting FILENAME.

The optional third argument ALONG-WITH-FILE, if non-nil, means that
the old visited file has been renamed to the new name FILENAME.

15254-----